Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1141.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4102(b)(1) of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4102. Taxes and assessments.* * *(b) Video gaming terminal tax and assessments.--(1) The department shall determine and each terminal operator licensee shall pay on a bimonthly basis:(i) A tax of [42%] 40% of its gross terminal revenue 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 from all video gaming terminals operated by the terminal operator licensee within this Commonwealth.(ii) A [10%] 9% local share assessment from its gross terminal revenue.(iii) A regulatory assessment established in section 4104 (relating to regulatory assessments) from the terminal operator licensee's weekly gross terminal revenue.* * *Section 2. Title 4 is amended by adding a part to read:PART IVLOCAL GAMING TERMINALSChapter51. General Provisions53. Administration55. Application and Licensure57. Operation59. Enforcement61. Revenues63. Ethics65. Miscellaneous ProvisionsCHAPTER 51GENERAL PROVISIONSSec.5101. Scope of part.5102. Legislative intent.5103. Definitions.§ 5101. Scope of part.This part relates to local gaming terminals.§ 5102. Legislative intent.20250HB1141PN1260 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The General Assembly recognizes the following public policy purposes and declares that the following objectives of the Commonwealth are to be served by this part:(1) The primary objective of this part, to which all other objectives and purposes are secondary, is to protect the public through the regulation and policing of all activities involving gaming, and to prohibit all forms of gaming, wagering and gambling in this Commonwealth that have not been expressly authorized by statute.(2) The authorization of local gaming in this part is intended to provide a significant source of new revenue to the Commonwealth and to licensed clubs, fraternal organizations and small businesses and to provide for new employment opportunities by creating skilled jobs for individuals related to the conduct of local gaming at licensed facilities in this Commonwealth, as well as supporting property tax relief, economic development opportunities and other similar initiatives.§ 5103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affiliate," "affiliate of" or "person affiliated with." A person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a specified person."Applicant." A person that, on the person's own behalf or on behalf of another, applies for permission to engage in an act or activity that is regulated under the provisions of this part."Associated equipment." Equipment or a mechanical, 20250HB1141PN1260 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electromechanical or electronic contrivance, component or machine used in connection with local gaming terminals or redemption terminals, including replacement parts, hardware and software."Background investigation." A security, criminal, credit and suitability investigation of a person as provided for in this part that includes the status of taxes owed to the United States, the Commonwealth and a political subdivision of the Commonwealth."Board." The Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board established under section 1201 (relating to Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board established)."Bureau." The Bureau of Investigations and Enforcement of the board."Cash." United States currency and coin, including cash equivalent."Cash equivalent." A ticket, token, chip, gift card, voucher, billet, electronic credit, prepaid debit card or other similar instrument or representation of more than nominal value that the board deems a cash equivalent in accordance with this part."Central control computer." A central site computer controlled by the department and accessible by the board to which all local gaming terminals communicate for the purpose of auditing capacity, real-time information retrieval of the details of any financial event that occurs in the operation of a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal, including, but not limited to, coin in, coin out, ticket in, ticket out, jackpots, local gaming terminal and redemption terminal door openings and power failure and remote local gaming terminal or redemption 20250HB1141PN1260 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 terminal activation and disabling of local gaming terminals or redemption terminals."Cheat." Any of the following:(1) To defraud or steal from a player, terminal operator licensee, establishment licensee or the Commonwealth while operating or playing a local gaming terminal, including causing, aiding, abetting or conspiring with another person to do so.(2) To alter or causing, aiding, abetting or conspiring with another person to alter the elements of chance, method of selection or criteria that determine:(i) The result of a local gaming terminal game. (ii) The amount or frequency of payment in a local gaming terminal game.(iii) The value of a wagering instrument.(iv) The value of a wagering credit.(3) The term does not include altering a local gaming terminal or associated equipment for maintenance or repair with the approval of a terminal operator licensee and the board."Cheating or thieving device." A device:(1) used or possessed with the intent to be used to cheat during the operation or play of a local gaming terminal; or(2) used to alter a local gaming terminal without the terminal operator licensee's and the board's approval."Coin-operated amusement game." A machine that requires the insertion of a coin, currency or token to play or activate a game the outcome of which is predominantly and primarily determined by the skill of the player and does not pay, award or 20250HB1141PN1260 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offer a prize in the form of cash or merchandise. The term does not include a slot machine, hybrid slot machine, video gaming terminal or local gaming terminal."Compensation." Anything of value, money or a financial benefit conferred on or received by a person in return for services rendered or to be rendered whether by the person or another."Complimentary service." A lodging, service or item provided to an individual at no cost or at a reduced cost that is not generally available to the public under similar circumstances. A group rate, including a convention and government rate, shall be deemed to be generally available to the public."Conduct of local gaming." The licensed placement, operation and play of local gaming terminals under this part, as authorized and approved by the board."Controlling interest." Any of the following:(1) For a publicly traded domestic or foreign corporation, the term means a person has a controlling interest in a legal entity, applicant or licensee if the person's sole voting rights under State law or corporate articles or bylaws entitle the person to elect or appoint one or more of the members of the board of directors or other governing board or the person holds an ownership or beneficial holding of 5% or more of the securities of the publicly traded corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other form of publicly traded legal entity, unless this presumption of control or ability to elect is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence.(2) For a privately held domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other 20250HB1141PN1260 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 form of privately held legal entity, the term means the holding of a security in the legal entity, unless this presumption of control is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence."Conviction." A finding of guilt or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, whether or not a judgment of sentence has been imposed as determined by the law of the jurisdiction in which the prosecution was held. The term does not include a conviction that has been expunged or overturned or for which an individual has been pardoned or had an order of Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition entered."Corporation." The term includes a publicly traded corporation."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Eligible establishment." An establishment that meets the eligibility criteria specified in section 5513(f) (relating to local gaming establishment licenses)."Establishment license." A license issued by the board authorizing an establishment to permit a terminal operator licensee to place and operate local gaming terminals on the establishment's premises under this part and the rules and regulations promulgated under this part."Establishment licensee." A local gaming establishment that holds an establishment license."Executive-level public employee." The term includes the following:(1) A deputy secretary of the Commonwealth and a member of the Governor's Office executive staff.(2) An employee of the executive branch:(i) whose duties substantially involve licensing or 20250HB1141PN1260 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement under this part, who has discretionary power that may affect or influence the outcome of a Commonwealth agency's action or decision or who is involved in the development of regulations or policies relating to a licensed entity; or(ii) with law enforcement authority.(3) An employee of a county or municipality with:(i) discretionary powers that may affect or influence the outcome of the county's or municipality's action or decision related to this part or who is involved in the development of law, regulation or policy relating to matters regulated under this part; or(ii) law enforcement authority.(4) An employee of a department, agency, board, commission, authority or other governmental body not included in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) with:(i) discretionary power that may affect or influence the outcome of the governmental body's action or decision related to this part or who is involved in the development of regulation or policy relating to matters regulated under this part; or(ii) law enforcement authority."Financial backer." An investor, mortgagee, bondholder, noteholder or other sources of equity or capital provided to an applicant or licensed entity."Fund." The Local Gaming Fund established in section 6104 (relating to Local Gaming Fund)."Gaming employee." Either of the following:(1) An employee of a terminal operator licensee or manufacturer or supplier licensee who is not a key employee 20250HB1141PN1260 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and who the board determines is involved in the conduct of local gaming.(2) An employee of an establishment licensee whom the establishment licensee designates as the gaming manager in accordance with this part."Gaming manager." An individual employed by an establishment licensee and primarily responsible for the management of local gaming at the licensed premises as required by this part. A gaming manager may not be licensed as an employee of more than one licensed eligible establishment."Gaming service provider." A person not required to be licensed as a terminal operator, manufacturer, supplier or establishment licensee and provides goods or services to a terminal operator licensee that the board determines directly relates to the operation and security of a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal. The term shall not include a person that supplies goods or services that, at the discretion of the board, does not impact the integrity of local gaming, local gaming terminals or the connection of local gaming terminals to the central control computer system, including:(1) Seating to accompany local gaming terminals.(2) Structural or cosmetic renovations, improvements or other alterations to a local gaming area."Gross terminal revenue." The total of cash or cash equivalents received by a local gaming terminal minus the total of cash or cash equivalents paid out to players as a result of playing a local gaming terminal. The term does not include counterfeit cash or cash taken in a fraudulent act perpetrated against a terminal operator licensee for which the terminal operator licensee is not reimbursed.20250HB1141PN1260 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Holding company." A person, other than an individual, which, directly or indirectly, owns or has the power or right to control or to vote a significant part of the outstanding voting securities of a corporation or other form of business organization. A holding company indirectly has, holds or owns such power, right or security if it does so through an interest in a subsidiary or successive subsidiaries."Incentive." Consideration, including a promotion or prize, provided to a player or potential player as an enticement to play a local gaming terminal. "Inducement." Any of the following:(1) Consideration paid directly or indirectly, from a manufacturer, supplier, terminal operator, procurement agent, employee or another person on behalf of an applicant or a licensee under this part to an eligible establishment, establishment licensee, establishment licensee owner or an employee of the establishment licensee, directly or indirectly as an enticement to enter into a terminal placement agreement with the terminal operator and solicit or maintain the establishment licensee or establishment licensee owner's business.(2) Cash, incentive, marketing and advertising cost, gift, food, beverage, loan, prepayment of gross terminal revenue and other contribution or payment that offsets an establishment licensee's operational costs or as otherwise determined by the board.(3) The term does not include the cost paid by a terminal operator applicant or terminal operator licensee related to making local gaming terminals operate at the premises of an establishment licensee, including wiring and 20250HB1141PN1260 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rewiring, software updates, ongoing local gaming terminal maintenance, redemption terminals, network connections, site controllers and cost associated with communicating with the central control computer system.(4) Structural changes necessary to segregate the local gaming area or maintain the security of local gaming terminals and redemption terminals as required by the board that do not exceed $2,500, except that any changes in excess of $2,500 must be shared equally between the terminal operator applicant or terminal operator licensee and the establishment applicant or establishment licensee.(5) Surveillance technology to monitor only the local gaming area.(6) Operation of local gaming terminals at a licensed establishment, including wiring and rewiring, software updates, ongoing local gaming terminal maintenance, redemption terminals, network connections, site controllers and costs associated with communicating with the central computer system.(7) Installation of a security and alarm system at the premises of an establishment licensee that are reasonably necessary to protect local gaming terminals and redemption terminals outside normal business hours, provided that the cost does not exceed $1,000.(8) A requirement established by the board regarding a minimum standard for a local gaming area.(9) A fee established by the board to cover costs associated with the mandatory employee training program established under section 3706 (relating to compulsive and problem gambling).20250HB1141PN1260 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Institutional investor." A retirement fund administered by a public agency for the exclusive benefit of Federal, State or local public employees, investment company registered under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 2D Subch. I (relating to investment companies), collective investment trust organized by banks under Part Nine of the Rules of the Comptroller of the Currency, closed-end investment trust, chartered or licensed life insurance company or property and casualty insurance company, banking and other chartered or licensed lending institution, investment advisor registered under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 2D Subch. II (relating to investment advisers) and any other person as the board determines is consistent with this part."Intermediary." A person, other than an individual, that is:(1) a holding company with respect to a corporation or other form of business organization, that holds or applies for a license under this part; and(2) a subsidiary with respect to a holding company."Key employee." The term includes the following:(1) An individual employed by a manufacturer licensee or a terminal operator licensee and designated by the licensee to have primary authority to make decisions regarding the conduct of local gaming.(2) A gaming manager.(3) Any other individual employed by a manufacturer licensee or terminal operator licensee whom the board, in its reasonable discretion, determines holds primary authority to make decisions regarding the conduct of local gaming."Key employee licensee." An individual who holds a key employee license."Law enforcement authority." The power to conduct 20250HB1141PN1260 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigations of or to make arrests for criminal offenses."Licensed entity." A terminal operator licensee, establishment licensee or manufacturer licensee under this part."Licensed entity representative." A person, including an attorney, agent or lobbyist, acting on behalf of or authorized to represent the interest of an applicant, licensee or other person authorized by the board to engage in an act or activity that is regulated under this part regarding a matter before or that may reasonably be expected to come before the board."Licensed facility." As defined in section 1103 (relating to definitions)."Licensed gaming entity." As defined in section 1103."Licensee." A person licensed under this part."Local gaming area." The area of an establishment licensee's premises where local gaming terminals and redemption terminals are installed for operation and play."Local gaming terminal."(1) Any of the following:(i) A mechanical, computerized or electrical contrivance, game, terminal, machine or other device approved by the board which, upon insertion or payment of cash or cash equivalent as a wager, is available to play or operate one or more games, the play or outcome of which is determined by any element of either chance or skill, and may deliver or entitle the player to receive cash or cash equivalent, or any instrument or representation of value that is more than nominal, as determined by the board in its sole discretion.(ii) Any video gaming terminal including those in operation at a truck stop establishment as defined in 20250HB1141PN1260 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 3102 (relating to definitions).(iii) Associated equipment necessary to conduct the operation of the contrivance, terminal, machine or other device.(2) The term does not include:(i) A lottery game, as that term is defined under the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law.(ii) A gambling-style device or game made available for play at a family entertainment center in accordance with the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses).(iii) A coin-operated amusement game.(iv) A device used to play multiplayer video gaming competitions where the element of chance does not have a material effect on the play or outcome of the game.(v) A redemption terminal or other associated equipment necessary to operate or utilize a machine or device described in subparagraph (i).(vi) A slot machine, a hybrid slot machine or a skill slot machine currently in operation at a licensed facility under Part II (related to gaming).(vii) Any game determined by the board, in its sole discretion, to fall within subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv)."Manufacturer." A person that manufactures, builds, rebuilds, fabricates, assembles, produces, programs, designs or otherwise makes modifications to a local gaming terminal, redemption terminal or associated equipment for use or play of local gaming terminals in this Commonwealth.20250HB1141PN1260 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Manufacturer license." A license issued by the board authorizing a manufacturer to manufacture or produce local gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated equipment for use in this Commonwealth. The term does not include a terminal operator who manufactures redemption terminals for its own use and does not sell manufacturer terminals to other licensees."Manufacturer licensee." A person that holds a manufacturer license issued under this part."Minor." An individual under 21 years of age."Municipality." A city, township, borough or incorporated town."Non-institutional lender." An individual or entity which provides financing to a terminal operator applicant or licensee and is not a licensed financial institution, where such financing does not involve any component of convertible debt, warrants, other forms of equity or similar rights, including the ability to influence or control the operations of the terminal operator applicant or licensee, representation on the terminal operator applicant or licensee's board of directors or its equivalent, or the ability to elect one or more directors."Party." The bureau or an applicant, licensee, registrant or other person appearing of record in a proceeding before the board."Person." A natural person, corporation, foundation, organization, business trust, estate, limited liability company, trust, partnership, limited liability partnership, association or other form of legal business entity."Player." An individual who wagers cash or a cash equivalent in the play or operation of a local gaming terminal.20250HB1141PN1260 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Principal." Any of the following:(1) An officer, director, person that directly holds a beneficial interest in or ownership of the securities of an applicant or anyone licensed under this part.(2) A person that has a controlling interest in an applicant or anyone licensed under this part or has the ability to elect a majority of the board of directors of a licensee or to otherwise control anyone licensed under this part.(3) A procurement agent, lender or other licensed financial institution of an applicant or anyone licensed under this part, other than a bank or lending institution which makes a loan or holds a mortgage or other lien acquired in the ordinary course of business or a non-institutional lender.(4) An underwriter of an applicant or anyone licensed under this part or other person or employee of an applicant.(5) A terminal operator licensee, manufacturer licensee or supplier licensee deemed to be a principal by the board, including a procurement agent."Procurement agent." A person that shares in the gross terminal revenue or is otherwise compensated for the purpose of soliciting or procuring a terminal placement agreement."Publicly traded corporation." A person, other than an individual, that:(1) has a class or series of securities registered under 15 U.S.C. Ch.2B (relating to securities exchanges);(2) is a registered management company under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 2D Subch. I; or(3) is subject to the reporting obligations imposed by 20250HB1141PN1260 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 15 U.S.C. Ch. 2B by reason of having filed a registration statement that has become effective under 15 U.S.C. Ch.2A Subch. I (relating to domestic securities)."Redemption terminal." The collective hardware, software, communications technology and other ancillary equipment used to facilitate the payment of cash or a cash equivalent to a player as a result of playing a local gaming terminal. "Security." As defined in the act of December 5, 1972 (P.L.1280, No.284), known as the Pennsylvania Securities Act of 1972."Slot machine." As defined in section 1103."State Treasurer." The State Treasurer of the Commonwealth."Subsidiary." As defined in section 1103."Supplier." A person that sells, leases, offers or otherwise provides, distributes or services any local gaming terminal, redemption terminal or associated equipment for use or play in this Commonwealth."Supplier license." A license issued by the board authorizing a supplier to provide products or services related to local gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated equipment for use in this Commonwealth."Supplier licensee." A person that holds a supplier license."Terminal operator." A person that owns, services or maintains local gaming terminals for placement and operation on the premises of an establishment licensee."Terminal operator license." A license issued by the board authorizing a terminal operator to place and operate local gaming terminals in an establishment licensee's premises in accordance with this part and the rules and regulations promulgated under this part.20250HB1141PN1260 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Terminal operator licensee." A person that holds a terminal operator license."Terminal placement agreement." The formal written agreement or contract between an applicant for a terminal operator license or terminal operator licensee and an applicant for an establishment license or establishment licensee that establishes the terms and conditions regarding the placement of local gaming terminals and the conduct of local gaming.CHAPTER 53ADMINISTRATIONSec.5301. Powers of board.5302. Regulatory authority of board.5303. Temporary regulations.5304. Appeals.5305. Records and confidentiality of information.5306. Reporting.5307. Diversity.5308. Authority of department.5309. Central control computer system.5310. Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency.§ 53 01. Powers of board. (a) General powers.--(1) The board shall have general and sole regulatory authority over the conduct of local gaming as described in this part. The board shall ensure the integrity of the acquisition and operation of local gaming terminals, redemption terminals and associated equipment and shall have sole regulatory authority over every aspect of the conduct of 20250HB1141PN1260 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 local gaming. (2) The board may employ individuals as necessary to carry out the requirements of this part who shall serve at the board's pleasure.(b) Specific powers.--The board shall have the power and duty:(1) To require background investigations from certain applicants and licensees.(2) At its discretion, to issue, approve, renew, revoke, suspend, condition or deny issuance or renewal of licenses or other authorizations that may be required by the board under this part.(3) At its discretion, to suspend, condition or deny the issuance or renewal of a license or other authorization or levy a fine or other sanction for a violation of this part.(4) To require prospective and licensed gaming employees to submit to fingerprinting by the Pennsylvania State Police or its authorized designee. The Pennsylvania State Police or its authorized designee shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining records of criminal arrests and convictions.(5) To require prospective and licensed gaming employees to submit photographs consistent with a statement of policy developed by the board.(6) To determine the suitability of a person that furnishes or seeks to furnish to a terminal operator licensee directly or indirectly goods, services or property related to the conduct of local gaming.(7) To approve an application for or issue or renew a 20250HB1141PN1260 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license or other authorization that may be required by the board, if the board is satisfied the person has demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence that the person is of good character, honesty and integrity whose prior activities, criminal record, if any, reputation, habits and associations do not pose a threat to the public interest or the effective regulation and control of local gaming or create or enhance the danger of unsuitable, unfair or illegal practices, methods and activities in the conduct of local gaming or the carrying on of the business and financial arrangements incidental thereto.(8) To publish on the board's publicly accessible Internet website a complete list of persons or entities who applied for or held a terminal operator license, establishment license or manufacturer license at any time during the preceding calendar year and affiliates, intermediaries, subsidiaries and holding companies thereof and the status of the applications or licenses.(9) To prepare and, through the Governor, submit annually to the General Assembly an itemized budget consistent with Article VI of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, consisting of the amounts necessary to be appropriated by the General Assembly out of the accounts established under section 6102 (relating to regulatory assessments) required to meet the obligations under this part accruing during the fiscal period beginning July 1 of the following year.(10) In the event that appropriations for the administration of this part are not enacted by June 30 of any year, funds appropriated for the administration of this part 20250HB1141PN1260 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which are unexpended, uncommitted and unencumbered at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available for expenditure by the board or other agency to which the funds were appropriated until the enactment of an appropriation for the ensuing fiscal year.(11) To collect and post information on the board's publicly accessible Internet website with sufficient detail to inform the public of persons with a controlling interest or ownership interest in an applicant for a license or affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant for a license. The posting shall include:(i) If the applicant is a publicly traded domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other legal entity, the names of persons with a controlling interest.(ii) If the applicant is a privately held domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other legal entity, the names of all persons with an ownership interest equal to or greater than 5%.(iii) The name of a person entitled to cast the vote of a person named under subparagraph (i) or (ii).(iv) The names of officers, directors and principals of the applicant for a license or licensee.(12) Determine, designate and classify employees of an applicant entity or licensed entity as key employees.(13) Designate and classify games as local gaming terminals.(14) Refer potential violations of the criminal provisions in this part or of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) to the Pennsylvania State Police for 20250HB1141PN1260 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigation and initiation of proceedings as specified in Chapter 59 (relating to enforcement).§ 53 02. Regulatory authority of board. (a) Board powers.--The board shall have the power and duty:(1) To deny, deny the renewal of, revoke, condition or suspend a license or permit provided for in this part if the board finds in its sole discretion that an applicant, licensee or permittee or its officers, employees or agents have furnished false or misleading information to the board or failed to comply with the provisions of this part or the rules and regulations of the board and that it would be in the public interest to deny, deny the renewal of, revoke, condition or suspend the license or permit.(2) To restrict access to confidential information in the possession of the board that has been obtained under this part and ensure that the confidentiality of information is maintained and protected.(3) To prescribe and require periodic financial reporting and internal control requirements for terminal operator licensees.(4) To require that a terminal operator licensee provide to the board its annual financial statements, with such additional detail as the board requires, which shall be submitted not later than 180 days after the end of the licensee's fiscal year.(5) To prescribe the procedures to be followed by terminal operator licensees for a financial event that occurs in the operation and play of local gaming terminals. (6) To require that an establishment licensee prohibit minors from operating or using local gaming terminals or 20250HB1141PN1260 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 redemption terminals.(7) To establish procedures for the inspection and certification of compliance of local gaming terminals, redemption terminals and associated equipment prior to being placed into use on the premises of an establishment licensee by a terminal operator licensee.(8) To require that a local gaming terminal may not be set to pay out less than the theoretical payout percentage, which percentage shall be no less than 85% as specifically approved by the board. The board shall adopt regulations that define the theoretical payout percentage of a local gaming terminal game based on the total value of the jackpots expected to be paid by a play on a local gaming terminal game divided by the total value of local gaming terminals wagers expected to be made on that play or local gaming terminal game during the same portion of the game cycle. The board shall specify whether the calculation includes a portion of or the entire cycle of a local gaming terminal game. (9) To require that an establishment license applicant provide detailed site plans of its proposed local gaming area for review and approval by the board for the purpose of determining the adequacy of the proposed security and surveillance measures. The applicant shall cooperate with the board in making changes to the plans suggested by the board and shall ensure that the plans as modified and approved are implemented. The board shall not require a floor-to-ceiling wall to segregate the local gaming area, but may adopt rules to establish segregation requirements.(10) To promulgate rules and regulations governing the advertisement of local gaming terminals, provided that the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board shall require all advertisements to display or reference the toll-free problem gambling telephone number maintained by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency under section 53 10(b) (relating to Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency).(11) To enter into contracts with persons for the purposes of carrying out the powers and duties of the board under this part.(12) To adopt regulations governing the postemployment limitations and restrictions applicable to members and employees of the board subject to section 6302 (relating to additional board restrictions). In developing the regulations, the board may consult with the State Ethics Commission, governmental agencies and the Disciplinary Board of the Supreme Court regarding postemployment limitations and restrictions on members and employees of the board who are members of the Pennsylvania Bar.(13) To review and approve all cash and cash equivalent handling policies and procedures employed by terminal operator licensees.(14) To promulgate rules and regulations governing the placement of automated teller machines within or adjacent to local gaming areas. (15) To establish mandatory age-verification training and procedures for establishment licensees and their employees to ensure that minors do not access a local gaming area, local gaming terminal or redemption terminal. (16) To establish mandatory problem gambling training to be completed by all employees of licensed entities under this part.20250HB1141PN1260 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (17) To promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this part.(b) Applicable law.--Except as provided in section 53 03 (relating to temporary regulations), regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law, and the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.§ 53 03. Temporary regulations. (a) Promulgation.--In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this part, the board shall promulgate regulations within 45 days following the effective date of this subsection, which such regulations shall be deemed temporary regulations and shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The board may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Expiration.--Except for temporary regulations related to security and surveillance, the authority provided to the board to adopt temporary regulations in subsection (a) shall expire two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. Regulations adopted after that date shall be 20250HB1141PN1260 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promulgated as provided by law.§ 53 04. Appeals. An applicant, licensee or permittee may appeal a final order, determination or decision of the board involving the approval, issuance, denial, revocation, nonrenewal, suspension or conditioning, including any disciplinary action, of a license, permit or authorization under this part in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).§ 53 05. Records and confidentiality of information. (a) Records.--The board shall maintain files and records deemed necessary for the administration and enforcement of this part.(b) Confidentiality of information.--(1) The following information submitted by an applicant, licensee or permittee under Chapter 55 (relating to application and licensure) or obtained by the board or the bureau as part of a background or other investigation from any source shall be confidential and withheld from public disclosure:(i) Information relating to character, honesty and integrity, including family, habits, reputation, history of criminal activity, business activities, financial affairs and business, professional and personal associations submitted to or otherwise obtained by the board or the bureau.(ii) Nonpublic personal information, including home addresses, telephone numbers and other personal contact information, Social Security numbers, educational 20250HB1141PN1260 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 records, memberships, medical records, tax returns and declarations, actual or proposed compensation, financial account records, creditworthiness or financial condition relating to an applicant, licensee or permittee or the immediate family thereof.(iii) Information relating to proprietary information, trade secrets, patents or exclusive licenses, architectural and engineering plans and information relating to competitive marketing materials and strategies, including customer-identifying information or customer prospects for services subject to competition.(iv) Security information, including risk prevention plans, detection and countermeasures, emergency management plans, security and surveillance plans, equipment and usage protocols and theft and fraud prevention plans and countermeasures.(v) Information with respect to which there is a reasonable possibility that public release or inspection of the information would constitute an unwarranted invasion into personal privacy of an individual as determined by the board.(vi) Records of an applicant, licensee or permittee not required to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission by issuers that either have securities registered under 15 U.S.C. § 78l (relating to registration requirements for securities) or are required to file reports under 15 U.S.C. § 78o (relating to registration and regulation of brokers and dealers).(vii) Records considered nonpublic matters or 20250HB1141PN1260 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information by the Securities and Exchange Commission as provided by 17 CFR 200.80 (relating to Securities and Exchange Commission records and information).(viii) Financial information provided to the board by an applicant or licensee.(2) No claim of confidentiality may be made regarding criminal history record information that is available to the public under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b) (relating to general regulations).(3) Except as provided in paragraph (1), no claim of confidentiality may be made regarding a record in possession of the board that is otherwise publicly available from the board under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(4) Except as provided in section 5904(h) (relating to investigations and enforcement), the information made confidential under this section shall be withheld from public disclosure in whole or in part, except that confidential information shall be released upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction or, with the approval of the Attorney General, to a duly authorized law enforcement agency or shall be released to the public, in whole or in part, to the extent that the release is requested by an applicant, licensee or permittee and does not otherwise contain confidential information about another person.(5) The board may seek a voluntary waiver of confidentiality from an applicant, licensee or permittee but may not require an applicant, licensee or permittee to waive the confidentiality provided under this subsection as a condition for the approval of an application, renewal of a 20250HB1141PN1260 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license or other action of the board.(6) (i) No current or former member and no current or former employee, agent or independent contractor of the board, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General or other executive branch office who has obtained confidential information in the performance of duties under this part shall intentionally disclose the information to a person, knowing that the information being disclosed is confidential under this subsection, unless the person is authorized by law to receive it.(ii) A violation of this subsection shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree.(iii) In addition to any penalty under subparagraph (ii), an employee, agent or independent contractor who violates this subsection shall be administratively disciplined by discharge, suspension, termination of contract or other formal disciplinary action as appropriate. If a current member violates this paragraph, the other members shall refer the matter to the current member's appointing authority.(c) Notice.--Notice of the contents of information, except to a duly authorized law enforcement agency pursuant to this section, shall be given to an applicant or licensee in a manner prescribed by the rules and regulations adopted by the board.(d) Information held by other agencies.--Files, records, reports and other information in the possession of the department pertaining to an applicant, licensee or permittee shall be made available to the board as may be necessary to the effective administration of this part.20250HB1141PN1260 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 53 06. Reporting. (a) Report by board.--Beginning October 1, 2026, and every year thereafter, the annual report submitted to the Governor and the General Assembly by the board under section 1211 (relating to reports of board) shall include information on the conduct of local gaming for the previous calendar year: (1) Total gross terminal revenue.(2) Total number of terminal operator licensees, establishment licensees and manufacturer licensees.(3) All taxes, fees, fines and other revenue collected and, where appropriate, revenue disbursed. The department shall collaborate with the board to carry out the requirements of this paragraph.(4) Other information related to the conduct of local gaming that the board deems appropriate.(b) Participation.--The board may require licensees to provide information to the board to assist in the preparation of the report under subsection (a).§ 53 07. Diversity. (a) Intent.--It is the intent and goal of the General Assembly that the board promote and ensure diversity in the gaming activities authorized under this part.(b) Reports by applicants.--An applicant for a terminal operator license shall submit a diversity plan to the board. At a minimum, the diversity plan shall contain a summary of:(1) All employee recruitment and retention efforts undertaken to promote the participation of diverse groups in employment with the applicant if issued a terminal operator license.(2) Other information deemed necessary by the board to 20250HB1141PN1260 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assess the diversity plan.(c) Review.--The board shall conduct a review of a diversity plan. When reviewing the adequacy of a diversity plan, the board shall take into consideration the total number of local gaming terminals the applicant proposes to operate within this Commonwealth.(d) Periodic review.--The board shall periodically review the terminal operator licensee's diversity plan and recommend changes.(e) Applicant or licensee responsibility.--An applicant or licensee shall provide information as required by the board to enable the board to complete the reviews required under subsections (c) and (d).§ 53 08. Authority of department. (a) Powers.--The department shall administer and collect taxes imposed under this part and interest imposed under section 806 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, and promulgate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out its prescribed duties in accordance with this part, including the collection of taxes, penalties and interest imposed by this part.(b) Application of rules and regulations.--The department may prescribe the extent, if any, to which any rules and regulations shall be applied without retroactive effect. The department shall prescribe the forms and the system of accounting and recordkeeping to be employed and through its representative shall at all times have power of access to and examination and audit of any equipment and records relating to all aspects of the operation of local gaming terminals and redemption terminals under this part.20250HB1141PN1260 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Procedure.--For purposes of implementing this part, the department may promulgate regulations in the same manner in which the board is authorized as provided in section 53 03 (relating to temporary regulations).(d) Additional penalty.--A person that fails to timely remit to the department or the State Treasurer amounts required under this part shall be liable, in addition to liability imposed elsewhere in this part, to a penalty of 5% per month up to a maximum of 25% of the amounts ultimately found to be due, to be recovered by the department.(e) Liens and suits for taxes.--The provisions of this part shall be subject to the provisions of sections 242 and 243 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.§ 53 09. Central control computer system. (a) Control.--To facilitate the auditing and security programs critical to the integrity of local gaming terminals in this Commonwealth, the department shall have overall control of local gaming terminals which shall: (1) Be linked, at an appropriate time to be determined by the department, to a central control computer under the control of the department and accessible by the board to provide auditing program capacity and individual terminal information as approved by the department.(2) Include real-time information retrieval and terminal activation and disabling programs.(b) System requirements.--The central control computer employed by the department shall provide:(1) A fully operational Statewide local gaming terminal control system that has the capability of supporting all 20250HB1141PN1260 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 local gaming terminals permitted to be in operation under this part.(2) The employment of a widely accepted gaming industry protocol to facilitate a local gaming terminal manufacturers' ability to communicate with the Statewide system and must allow for remote software updates of the local gaming terminals.(3) The delivery of a system that has the ability to verify software, detect alterations in payout and detect other methods of fraud in all aspects of the operation of local gaming terminals. (4) The delivery of a system that does not alter the statistical awards of local gaming terminal games as designed by the manufacturer and approved by the board.(5) The delivery of a system that provides redundancy so that each component of the network is capable of operating independently by the department if any component of the network, including the central control computer, fails or cannot be operated for any reason as determined by the department, and to assure that all transactional data is captured and secured. Costs associated with a computer system required by the department to operate within a local gaming area, whether independent or as part of the central control computer, shall be paid by the terminal operator licensee. The computer system shall be controlled by the department and accessible to the board.(6) The ability to meet all reporting and control requirements as prescribed by the board and department.(7) The delivery of a system that provides centralized issuance of cash redemption tickets and facilitates the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acceptance of the tickets by local gaming terminals and redemption terminals.(8) Other capabilities as determined by the department in consultation with the board.(c) Personal information.--The central control computer may not provide for the monitoring or reading of personal or financial information concerning a patron of a terminal operator licensee.(d) Initial acquisition of central control computer.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and in order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this part, initial contracts entered into by the department for a central control computer, including necessary computer hardware, software, licenses or related services, shall not be subject to the provisions of 62 Pa.C.S. (relating to procurement).(2) Contracts executed under this section may not exceed five years.(e) Resolution of contract disputes.--The process specified in 62 Pa.C.S. Ch. 17 Subch. B (relating to prelitigation resolution of controversies) shall be the sole means of resolution for controversies arising with respect to contracts executed under this section.(f) Existing central control computer system.--The department, in its discretion, may alter or utilize the central control computer system controlled by the department under section 1323 (relating to central control computer system) to fulfill the requirements of this section.§ 53 10. Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency.20250HB1141PN1260 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Program update.--(1) The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency shall update the compulsive and problem gambling program established in section 1509 (relating to compulsive and problem gambling program) to address public education, awareness and training regarding compulsive and problem gambling and the treatment and prevention of compulsive and problem gambling related to local gaming terminals.(2) The updated guidelines shall include strategies for the prevention of compulsive and problem gambling related to local gaming terminals. (3) The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency shall consult with the board and terminal operator licensees to develop the strategies.(b) Duties of Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency.--From money available in the Compulsive and Problem Gambling Treatment Fund, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency shall, with respect to local gaming terminals: (1) Maintain one compulsive gamblers assistance organization's toll-free problem gambling telephone number, which number shall be 1-800-GAMBLER, to provide crisis counseling and referral services to individuals and families experiencing difficulty as a result of problem or compulsive gambling.(2) Maintain one compulsive gambler's assistance organization's telephone number, which shall be accessible via a free text message service, to provide crisis counseling and referral services to individuals and families 20250HB1141PN1260 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 experiencing difficulty as a result of problem or compulsive gambling.(3) Facilitate, through in-service training and other means, the availability of effective assistance programs for problem and compulsive gamblers and family members affected by problem and compulsive gambling.(4) At its discretion, conduct studies to identify individuals in this Commonwealth who are or are at risk of becoming problem or compulsive gamblers.(5) Provide grants to and contract with single county authorities and other organizations that provide services specified in this section.(6) Reimburse organizations for reasonable expenses incurred assisting the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency with implementing this section.(7) Maintain a comprehensive list of all self-excluded individuals under section 1516 (relating to list of persons self excluded from gaming activities), 3903 (relating to self-exclusion) or 5903 (relating to self-exclusion).(c) Additional duties.--Within 90 days following the effective date of this subsection, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency and the board's Office of Compulsive and Problem Gambling shall jointly collaborate with other appropriate offices and agencies of State or local government, including single county authorities and providers and other persons, public or private, with expertise in compulsive and problem gambling treatment, and shall, with respect to local gaming terminals: (1) Implement a strategic plan for the prevention and treatment of compulsive and problem gambling.20250HB1141PN1260 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Adopt compulsive and problem gambling treatment standards to be integrated with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs' or successor agency's uniform Statewide guidelines that govern the provision of addiction treatment services.(3) Develop a method to coordinate compulsive and problem gambling data collection and referral information to crisis response hotlines, child welfare and domestic violence programs and providers and other appropriate programs and providers.(4) Develop and disseminate educational materials to provide public awareness related to the prevention, recognition and treatment of compulsive and problem gambling.(5) Develop demographic-specific compulsive and problem gambling prevention, intervention and treatment programs.(6) Prepare an itemized budget outlining how funds will be allocated to fulfill the responsibilities under this section.(d) Report.--The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency shall include in the report required under section 1509 information involving local gaming terminals. CHAPTER 55APPLICATION AND LICENSURESec.55 01. General prohibition. 55 02. Local gaming terminal operator licenses. 55 03. Existing licensees. 55 04. Principal licenses. 55 05. Key employee licenses. 55 06. Divestiture of disqualifying applicant. 20250HB1141PN1260 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 55 07. Supplier licenses. 55 08. Local gaming manufacturer licenses. 55 09. Gaming service provider. 55 10. (Reserved). 55 11. Alternative local gaming terminal operator licensing standards.55 12. Alternative local gaming manufacturer licensing standards.55 13. Local gaming establishment licenses. 55 14. License or permit prohibition. 55 15. Issuance and renewal. 55 16. Change in ownership or control of licensee. 55 17. Local gaming terminal accounting controls and audits. 55 18. Multiple licenses prohibited. 5519. Conditional licenses.§ 55 01. General prohibition. A person who offers or otherwise makes available for play in this Commonwealth a local gaming terminal or other gambling device or game that offers the player the ability to place a wager on the outcome of an uncertain event or game, but is not licensed by the board or expressly authorized by statute, commits a crime in violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5513 (relating to gambling devices, gambling, etc.) and is subject to the penalties specified in section 5905 (relating to prohibited acts and penalties).§ 55 02. Local gaming terminal operator licenses. (a) General requirements.--An application for a local gaming terminal operator license shall be on the form required by the board and shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) The name, address and photograph of the applicant 20250HB1141PN1260 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and of all directors and owners and key employees and their positions within the corporation or organization, as well as additional financial information required by the board.(2) A current tax lien certificate issued by the department.(3) The details of any gaming license applied for, granted to or denied to the applicant by another jurisdiction where the form of gaming is legal and the consent for the board to acquire copies of the application submitted or license issued in connection with the application.(4) The details of any loan obtained from a financial institution or not obtained from a financial institution.(5) The consent to conduct a background investigation by the board, the scope of which investigation shall be determined by the bureau in its discretion consistent with the provisions of this part, and a release signed by all persons subject to the investigation of all information required to complete the investigation.(6) The details of the applicant's diversity plan to assure that all persons are accorded equality of opportunity in employment and contracting by the applicant, its contractors, subcontractors, assignees, lessees, agents, vendors and suppliers.(7) Any information concerning maintenance and operation of local gaming terminals in any other jurisdiction. (8) Proof that the applicant has or will establish a place of business in this Commonwealth. A terminal operator licensee shall maintain its place of business in this Commonwealth to remain eligible for licensure.(9) Any other information determined to be appropriate 20250HB1141PN1260 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the board.(b) Character requirements.--An application for a terminal operator license shall include such information, documentation and assurances as may be required to establish by clear and convincing evidence of the applicant's suitability, including good character, honesty and integrity. The application shall include, without limitation, information pertaining to family, habits, character, reputation, criminal history background, business activities, financial affairs and business, professional and personal associates, covering at least the 10-year period immediately preceding the filing date of the application.(c) Civil judgments.--An applicant shall notify the board of any civil judgment obtained against the applicant pertaining to laws of the Federal Government, this Commonwealth or another state, jurisdiction, province or country.(d) (Reserved).(e) (Reserved).(f) Additional eligibility requirements.--In order to be eligible for a terminal operator license under this part, the principals and key employees of the applicant must obtain a license to meet the character requirements of this section or other eligibility requirements established by the board.(g) Classification system.--The board shall develop a classification system for other agents, employees or persons who directly or indirectly hold or are deemed to be holding debt or equity securities or other financial interest in the applicant and for other persons that the board considers appropriate for review under this section.(h) Related entities.--20250HB1141PN1260 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no person shall be eligible to receive a terminal operator license unless the principals and key employees of each intermediary or holding company of the person meet the requirements of subsection (f).(2) The board may require that lenders and underwriters of intermediaries, subsidiaries or holding companies of a terminal operator license applicant meet the requirements of subsection (f) if the board determines that the suitability of a lender or underwriter is at issue and necessary to consider a pending application for a terminal operator license.(i) Revocable privilege.--The issuance or renewal of a license or other authorization by the board under this section shall be a revocable privilege.(j) Waiver for publicly traded corporations.--The board may waive the requirements of subsection (f) for a person directly or indirectly holding ownership of securities in a publicly traded corporation if the board determines that the holder of the securities does not have the ability to control the corporation or elect one or more directors of the corporation.(k) (Reserved).(l) Ongoing duty.--A person applying for a license or other authorization under this part shall continue to provide information required by the board or the bureau and cooperate in any inquiry or investigation.(m) Criminal history record check.--The board may conduct a criminal history record check on a person for whom a waiver is granted under this section.(n) Applicant financial information.--20250HB1141PN1260 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The board shall require an applicant for a terminal operator license to produce the information, documentation and assurances concerning financial background and resources as the board deems necessary to establish by clear and convincing evidence the financial stability, integrity and responsibility of the applicant, its affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company, including, but not limited to, bank references, business and personal income and disbursement schedules, tax returns and other reports filed with governmental agencies and business and personal accounting and check records and ledgers.(2) An applicant shall in writing authorize the examination of all bank accounts and records deemed necessary by the board.(o) Financial backer information.--(1) The board shall require an applicant for a terminal operator license to produce the information, documentation and assurances as may be necessary to establish by clear and convincing evidence the integrity of all financial backers, institutional investors, investors, mortgagees, bondholders and holders of indentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, either in effect or proposed.(2) The board may waive the qualification requirements for banking or lending institutions, non-institutional lenders and institutional investors.(3) A banking or lending institution or institutional investor, non-institutional lender or other financing source shall produce for the board upon request any document or information that bears relation to the proposal submitted by the applicant.20250HB1141PN1260 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The integrity of the financial sources shall be judged upon the same standards as the applicant. Any such person or entity shall produce for the board upon request any document or information that bears any relation to the application.(5) The applicant shall produce the information, documentation or assurances the board requires to establish by clear and convincing evidence the adequacy of financial resources.(p) Applicant's business experience.--(1) The board shall require an applicant for a terminal operator license to produce the information, documentation and assurances as the board may require to establish by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant has sufficient business ability and experience to create and maintain a successful, efficient operation.(2) An applicant shall produce the names of all proposed key employees and a description of their respective or proposed responsibilities as they become known.(q) Additional information.--In addition to other information required by this part, a person applying for a terminal operator license shall provide the following information:(1) The organization, financial structure and nature of all businesses operated by the person, including any affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding companies, the names and personal employment and criminal histories of all officers, directors and key employees of the corporation, the names of all holding, intermediary, affiliate and subsidiary companies of the corporation and the organization, financial 20250HB1141PN1260 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 structure and nature of all businesses operated by such holding, intermediary and subsidiary companies as the board may require, including names and personal employment and criminal histories of such officers, directors and principal employees of such corporations and companies as the board may require.(2) The extent of securities held in the corporation by all officers, directors and underwriters and their remuneration in the form of salary, wages, fees or otherwise.(3) Copies of all management and service contracts.(r) Review and approval.--Upon being satisfied that the requirements of subsections (a), (b), (c), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (l), (m), (n), (o), (p) and (q) have been met, the board may approve the application and issue the applicant a terminal operator license consistent with all of the following:(1) (i) The license shall be valid for a period of five years.(ii) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to relieve a licensee of the affirmative duty to notify the board of any changes relating to the status of its license or to any information contained in the application materials on file with the board.(2) The license shall be nontransferable.(3) Any other condition established by the board.(s) Renewal.--(1) At least six months prior to expiration of a terminal operator license, the terminal operator licensee seeking renewal of its license shall submit a renewal application to the board.(2) If the renewal application satisfies the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements of subsections (a), (b), (c), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (l), (m), (n), (o), (p) and (q), the board may renew the licensee's terminal operator license.(3) If the board receives a complete renewal application but fails to act upon the renewal application prior to the expiration of the terminal operator license, the terminal operator license shall continue in effect until acted upon by the board.§ 55 03. Existing licensees. (a) Validity.--Nothing in this act shall affect the validity of any license or privileges afforded to a holder of any license issued under Part III (relating to video gaming).(b) Approval.--Any holder of a license issued under Part III that is valid on or after the effective date of this act shall, immediately upon submission of an application for license under this act and payment of the applicable fee, be approved for licensure by the board and shall enjoy all the privileges, without exception, afforded to a licensee under this act.(c) Timing.--Upon receipt of an application under this part from a licensee who is already licensed by the board under Part II (relating to gaming) or III, the board shall subject to the application an abbreviated application and licensure procedure established by the board. A licensing decision shall be rendered by the board within 60 days of submission of the application or earlier.§ 55 04. Principal licenses. (a) License required.--All principals shall obtain a principal license from the board.(b) Application.--A principal license application shall be in a form prescribed by the board and shall include the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following:(1) Verification of status as a principal from a terminal operator licensee, manufacturer licensee or supplier licensee.(2) A description of responsibilities as a principal.(3) All releases necessary to obtain information from governmental agencies, employers and other organizations.(4) Details relating to a similar license, permit or other authorization obtained in another jurisdiction.(5) Additional information required by the board.(c) Issuance.--Following review of the application and the background investigation, the board may issue a principal license if the applicant has proven by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant is a person of good character, honesty and integrity and is eligible and suitable to be licensed as a principal.(d) Nontransferability.--A license issued under this section shall be nontransferable.(e) Principals.--An individual who receives a principal license need not obtain a key employee license.§ 55 05. Key employee licenses. (a) License required.--A key employee, including a gaming manager and a procurement agent, shall obtain a key employee license from the board, regardless of whether employed by a licensee or serving as an independent contractor to the licensee.(b) Application.--A key employee license application shall be in a form prescribed by the board and shall include the following:(1) Verification of status as a key employee from a 20250HB1141PN1260 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 terminal operator licensee, establishment licensee, manufacturer licensee or supplier licensee.(2) A description of employment responsibilities.(3) All releases necessary to obtain information from governmental agencies, employers and other organizations.(4) Details relating to a similar license or other authorization obtained in another jurisdiction.(5) Additional information required by the board.(c) Issuance.--Following review of the application and the background investigation, the board may issue a key employee license if the applicant has proven by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant is a person of good character, honesty and integrity and is eligible and suitable to be licensed as a key employee.(d) Nontransferability.--A license issued under this section shall be nontransferable.§ 55 06. Divestiture of disqualifying applicant. (a) Board power to require.--(1) In the event that an establishment license application, terminal operator license application or manufacturer license application is not approved by the board based on a finding that an individual who is a principal or has an interest in the person applying for the license does not meet the character requirements of this part or any eligibility requirement under this part or a person who purchases a controlling interest in the applicant in violation of section 5516 (relating to change in ownership or control of licensee), the board may afford the individual the opportunity to completely divest the individual's interest in the person, its affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or 20250HB1141PN1260 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 holding company seeking the license and, after divestiture, reconsider the person's or applicant's suitability for licensure in an expedited proceeding and may, after the proceeding, issue the person or applicant a terminal operator license.(2) The board shall approve the terms and conditions of any divestiture under this section.(b) Limitation.--Under no circumstances shall any divestiture be approved by the board if the compensation for the divested interest exceeds the cost of the interest.§ 55 07. Supplier licenses. (a) Application.--(1) A manufacturer that elects to contract with a supplier under section 5508 (relating to local gaming manufacturer licenses) shall ensure that the supplier is appropriately licensed under this section.(2) A person seeking to provide local gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated equipment to a terminal operator licensee within this Commonwealth through a contract with a licensed manufacturer must apply to the board for the appropriate supplier license.(b) Requirements.--An application for a supplier license shall be on the form required by the board and shall include all of the following:(1) The name and business address of the applicant and the applicant's affiliates, intermediaries, subsidiaries and holding companies; the principals and key employees of each business; and a list of employees and their positions within each business, as well as financial information required by the board.20250HB1141PN1260 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A statement that the applicant and each affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of the applicant are not terminal operator licensees.(3) Proof that the applicant has or will establish a place of business in this Commonwealth. A supplier licensee shall maintain its place of business in this Commonwealth to remain eligible for licensure.(4) The consent to a background investigation by the bureau of the applicant, its principals and key employees or other persons required by the board and a release to obtain the information necessary for the completion of the background investigation.(5) The details of any supplier license issued by the board to the applicant under section 1317 (relating to supplier licenses) or section 3507 (relating to supplier licenses), if applicable.(6) The details of any equivalent license granted or denied by other jurisdictions where gaming activities as authorized by this part are permitted.(7) The type of goods and services to be supplied and whether those goods and services will be provided through purchase, lease, contract or otherwise.(8) Other information determined by the board to be appropriate.(c) Review and approval.--If the requirements of subsection (b) are met, the board may approve the application and issue the applicant a supplier license consistent with all of the following:(1) The license shall be valid for a period of five years. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 20250HB1141PN1260 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relieve a licensee of the affirmative duty to notify the board of a change relating to the status of its license or to information contained in the application materials on file with the board.(2) The license shall be nontransferable.(3) Other conditions established by the board.(d) Renewal.--(1) At least six months prior to expiration of a supplier license, the supplier licensee seeking renewal of a license shall submit a renewal application to the board.(2) If the renewal application satisfies the requirements of subsection (b), the board may renew the licensee's supplier license.(3) If the board receives a complete renewal application but fails to act upon the renewal application prior to the expiration of the supplier license, the supplier license shall continue in effect until acted upon by the board. § 55 08. Local gaming manufacturer licenses. (a) Application.--A person seeking to manufacture local gaming terminals, redemption terminals for sale to other licensees, and associated equipment for use in this Commonwealth must apply to the board for a manufacturer license.(b) Requirements.--An application for a manufacturer license shall be on the form required by the board and shall include all of the following:(1) The name and business address of the applicant and the applicant's affiliates, intermediaries, subsidiaries and holding companies, the principals and key employees of each business and a list of employees and their positions within each business, as well as financial information required by 20250HB1141PN1260 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the board.(2) A statement that the applicant and each affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of the applicant are not terminal operator licensees.(3) The consent to a background investigation by the bureau of the applicant, its principals, its key employees, its intermediaries, its subsidiaries or other persons required by the board and a release to obtain the information necessary for the completion of the background investigation.(4) The details of any equivalent license granted or denied by other jurisdictions where gaming activities as authorized by this part are permitted.(5) The details of any manufacturer license issued by the board to the applicant under section 1317.1 (relating to manufacturer licenses) or 3508 (relating to manufacturer licenses), if applicable.(6) The type of local gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated equipment to be manufactured or repaired.(7) Other information determined by the board to be appropriate.(c) Review and approval.--Upon being satisfied that the requirements of subsection (b) have been met, the board may approve the application and grant the applicant a manufacturer license consistent with all of the following:(1) (i) The license shall be valid for a period of five years.(ii) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to relieve the licensee of the affirmative duty to notify the board of a change relating to the status of its 20250HB1141PN1260 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license or to other information contained in application materials on file with the board.(2) The license shall be nontransferable.(3) Other conditions established by the board.(d) Renewal.--(1) At least six months prior to expiration of a manufacturer license, the manufacturer licensee seeking renewal of its license shall submit a renewal application accompanied by the renewal fee to the board.(2) If the renewal application satisfies the requirements of subsection (b), the board may renew the licensee's manufacturer license.(3) If the board receives a complete renewal application but fails to act upon the renewal application prior to the expiration of the manufacturer license, the manufacturer license shall continue in effect until acted upon by the board.(e) Authority.--(1) A manufacturer or its designee, as licensed by the board, may supply or repair a local gaming terminal, redemption terminal or associated equipment manufactured by the manufacturer, provided the manufacturer holds the appropriate manufacturer license.(2) A manufacturer of local gaming terminals or redemption terminals may contract with a supplier under section 5507 (relating to supplier licenses) to provide local gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated equipment to a terminal operator licensee within this Commonwealth, provided the supplier is licensed to supply local gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated 20250HB1141PN1260 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment.(f) Prohibitions.--(1) No person may manufacture local gaming terminals, redemption terminals for sale to other licensees or associated equipment for use within this Commonwealth by a terminal operator licensee unless the person has been issued the appropriate manufacturer license under this section.(2) No person issued a license under this section may apply for or be issued a terminal operator license under section 55 02 (relating to local gaming terminal operator licenses) or an establishment license under section 5513 (relating to local gaming establishment licenses).§ 55 09. Gaming service provider. (a) Development of classification system.--The board shall develop a classification system governing the certification, registration and regulation of gaming service providers and individuals and entities associated with them. The classification system shall be based upon the following:(1) Whether the employees of the gaming service provider will have access to the local gaming area or local gaming terminals or redemption terminals prior to or after installation.(2) Whether the goods or services provided or to be provided by the gaming service provider would impact the integrity of local gaming terminals, redemption terminals or the conduct of local gaming. (b) Authority to exempt.--The board may exempt a person or type of business from the requirements of this section if the board determines:(1) the person or type of business is regulated by an 20250HB1141PN1260 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency of the Federal Government, an agency of the Commonwealth or the Pennsylvania Supreme Court; or(2) the regulation of the person or type of business is determined not to be necessary in order to protect the public interest or the integrity of gaming.(c) Duties of gaming service providers.--A gaming service provider shall have a continuing duty to:(1) Provide all information, documentation and assurances as the board may require.(2) Cooperate with the board in investigations, hearings and enforcement and disciplinary actions.(3) Comply with all conditions, restrictions, requirements, orders and rulings of the board in accordance with this part.(4) Report a change in circumstances that may render the gaming service provider ineligible, unqualified or unsuitable for continued registration or certification.(d) (Reserved).(e) Interim authorization.--The board or a designated employee of the board may permit a gaming service provider applicant to engage in business with an applicant for a terminal operator license or a terminal operator licensee prior to approval of the gaming service provider application if the following criteria have been satisfied:(1) A completed application has been filed with the board by the gaming service provider.(2) The terminal operator license applicant or terminal operator licensee contracting or doing business with the gaming service provider certifies that it has performed due diligence on the gaming service provider and believes the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant meets the qualification to be a gaming service provider under this section.(3) The gaming service provider applicant agrees in writing that the grant of interim authorization to conduct business prior to board approval of the application does not create a right to continue to engage in business if the board determines that the applicant is not suitable or continued authorization is not in the public interest.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the board from rescinding a grant of interim authorization if, at any time, the suitability of the person subject to interim authorization is at issue or if the person fails to cooperate with the board, the bureau or an agent of the board or bureau.(g) Gaming service provider lists.--(1) The board shall:(i) Develop and maintain a list of approved gaming service providers authorized to provide goods or services whether under a grant of interim or continued authorization.(ii) Develop and maintain a list of prohibited gaming service providers.(2) An applicant for a terminal operator license or a terminal operator licensee may not enter into an agreement or engage in business with a gaming service provider listed on the prohibited gaming service provider list.(h) Emergency authorization.--(1) A terminal operator licensee may utilize a gaming service provider that has not been approved by the board when a threat to public health, welfare or safety exists or 20250HB1141PN1260 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 circumstances outside the control of the terminal operator licensee require immediate action to mitigate damage or loss to the licensee's local gaming terminals. (2) The board shall promulgate regulations to govern the use of gaming service providers under emergency circumstances. The regulations shall include a requirement that the terminal operator licensee contact the board immediately upon utilizing a gaming service provider that has not been approved by the board.(i) Criminal history record information.--If the classification system developed by the board in accordance with subsection (a) requires a gaming service provider or an individual or entity associated with the gaming service provider to submit to or provide the bureau with criminal history record information under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information), the bureau shall notify a terminal operator licensee that submitted a certification under subsection (e)(2) whether the applicant has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor gambling offense.§ 55 10. (Reserved). § 55 11. Alternative local gaming terminal operator licensing standards.(a) Determination.--(1) The board may determine whether the licensing standards of another jurisdiction within the United States in which an applicant, its affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company for a local gaming terminal operator license is similarly licensed are comprehensive and thorough and provide similar adequate safeguards as those required by this part.20250HB1141PN1260 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If the board makes that determination, it may issue a terminal operator license to an applicant who holds a terminal operator license in the other jurisdiction after conducting an evaluation of the information relating to the applicant from the other jurisdiction, as updated by the board, and evaluating other information related to the applicant received from the other jurisdiction and other jurisdictions where the applicant may be licensed, the board may incorporate the information in whole or in part into the board's evaluation of the applicant.(b) Abbreviated process.--(1) In the event an applicant for a terminal operator license is licensed in another jurisdiction, the board may determine to use an alternate process requiring only the information determined by the board to be necessary to consider the issuance of a license, including financial viability of the licensee, to the applicant.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive fees associated with obtaining a license through the normal application process.(c) Current license holders.--In the event an applicant for a terminal operator license under this part holds a slot machine license under Part II (relating to gaming) or III (relating to video gaming), the board shall use an abbreviated process requiring only the information determined by the board to be necessary to consider the issuance of a license, including financial viability of the applicant.§ 55 12. Alternative local gaming manufacturer and supplier licensing standards.(a) Determination.--20250HB1141PN1260 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The board may determine whether the licensing standards of another jurisdiction within the United States in which an applicant for a manufacturer or supplier license is similarly licensed are comprehensive and thorough and provide similar adequate safeguards as those required by this part.(2) If the board makes that determination, it may issue a manufacturer or supplier license to an applicant who holds a similar manufacturer or supplier license in the other jurisdiction after conducting an evaluation of the information relating to the applicant from the other jurisdiction, as updated by the board, and evaluating other information related to the applicant received from the other jurisdiction and other jurisdictions where the applicant may be licensed, the board may incorporate the information in whole or in part into the board's evaluation of the applicant.(b) Abbreviated process.--(1) In the event an applicant for a manufacturer or supplier license is licensed in another jurisdiction, the board may determine to use an abbreviated process requiring only the information determined by the board to be necessary to consider the issuance of a license, including financial viability of the applicant.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive fees associated with obtaining a license through the normal application process.(c) Current license holders.--In the event an applicant for a manufacturer or supplier license under this part holds a manufacturer license under section 1317.1 (relating to manufacturer licenses) or 3507 (relating to supplier licenses), 20250HB1141PN1260 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the board may determine to use an abbreviated process requiring only the information determined by the board to be necessary to consider the issuance of a license, including financial viability of the applicant.§ 55 13. Local gaming establishment licenses. (a) General requirements.--An eligible establishment that submits an application for a local gaming establishment license under this part shall include, at a minimum:(1) The name, address and photograph of the applicant and additional financial information required by the board.(2) A description of the proposed surveillance and security measures to ensure the security of the proposed local gaming area. (3) A current tax lien certificate issued by the department.(4) The criminal history record of the applicant, principal and key employees and a consent for the bureau to conduct a background investigation on the applicant, principals and key employees.(5) Other information determined to be appropriate by the board.(b) Nontransferability.--A license issued under this section shall be nontransferable.(c) Ongoing duty.--An eligible establishment applying for a license under this section shall continue to provide information required by the board or the bureau and cooperate in any inquiry or investigation.(d) Review and approval.--Upon being satisfied that the requirements of subsection (a) have been met, the board may approve the application and issue the applicant a local gaming 20250HB1141PN1260 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establishment license consistent with all of the following:(1) (i) The license shall be valid for a period of five years.(ii) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to relieve a licensee of the affirmative duty to notify the board of a change relating to the status of its license or to information contained in application materials on file with the board.(2) The license shall be nontransferable.(3) Other conditions established by the board.(e) Renewal.--(1) At least three months prior to expiration of an establishment license, the establishment licensee seeking renewal of its license shall submit a renewal application accompanied by the renewal fee to the board.(2) If the renewal application satisfies the requirements of subsection (d), the board may renew the licensee's establishment license.(3) If the board receives a complete renewal application but fails to act upon the renewal application prior to the expiration of the establishment license, the establishment license shall continue in effect until acted upon by the board.(f) Eligibility requirements.--The following establishments shall be eligible for a local gaming establishment license:(1) A facility that is a club license as defined by the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act.(2) A facility that is licensed as a lottery sales agent under section 305 of the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, 20250HB1141PN1260 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.91), known as the State Lottery Law, and is licensed to sell alcoholic beverages under section 404 or 407 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, with its license to sell alcoholic beverages being active and in good standing with the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board, as determined at the sole discretion of the board, in one of the following categories:(i) Brewery, Brewery Pub and Catering Club (Liquor).(ii) Club (Liquor).(iii) Club (Malt).(iv) Eating Place Retail Dispenser (Malt).(v) Hotel (Liquor).(vi) Hotel (Malt).(vii) Limited Distillery, Limited Winery, Privately owned Public Golf Course Restaurant; or(viii) Restaurant (Liquor).(g) Ineligible establishments.--The board may not issue an establishment license to:(1) a licensed facility under Part II (relating to gaming);(2) a licensed truck stop establishment under Part III (relating to video gaming);(3) a facility if the license to sell alcoholic beverages has been suspended or revoked as a result of a citation issued pursuant to section 471 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code; or(4) a facility that is unable to properly segregate a local gaming area from minors.§ 55 14. License or permit prohibition. (a) Limitations on power of board.--20250HB1141PN1260 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The board shall be prohibited from granting a license under this part to an applicant who has been convicted of a felony offense in any jurisdiction.(2) In addition to the prohibition under paragraph (1), the board shall be prohibited from granting the following:(i) A principal license or key employee license to an individual who has been convicted in a jurisdiction of a misdemeanor gambling offense, unless 15 years have elapsed from the date of conviction for the offense.(ii) A license other than a principal license or key employee license to an individual who has been convicted in a jurisdiction of a misdemeanor gambling offense, unless 15 years have elapsed from the date of conviction for the offense.(iii) An establishment license to an applicant who has been convicted in a jurisdiction of a misdemeanor gambling offense, unless 15 years have elapsed from the date of conviction for the offense.(3) Following the expiration of any prohibition period applicable to an applicant under paragraph (2), in determining whether to issue a license or permit, the board shall consider the following factors:(i) The nature and duties of the applicant's position with the licensed entity.(ii) The nature and seriousness of the offense or conduct.(iii) The circumstances under which the offense or conduct occurred.(iv) The age of the applicant when the offense or conduct was committed.20250HB1141PN1260 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Whether the offense or conduct was an isolated or a repeated incident.(vi) Evidence of rehabilitation, including good conduct in the community, counseling or psychiatric treatment received and the recommendation of individuals who have substantial contact with the applicant.(b) Definition.--For purposes of this section, the term "felony offense" means:(1) an offense classified as a felony or punishable under the laws of this Commonwealth by imprisonment for more than five years;(2) an offense which, under the laws of another jurisdiction, is:(i) classified as a felony; or(ii) punishable by imprisonment for more than five years; or(3) an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be subject to imprisonment for more than five years.§ 55 15. Issuance and renewal. (a) Issuance.--(1) In addition to any other criteria provided under this part, a terminal operator, eligible local gaming establishment, manufacturer, supplier, gaming employee, gaming manager, key employee, principal or other person that the board approves as qualified to receive a license or other authorization under this part shall be issued a license or permit upon the payment of a fee required in section 6101 (relating to fees) and fulfillment of conditions required by the board or provided for in this part.20250HB1141PN1260 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Nothing contained in this part is intended or shall be construed to create an entitlement to a license or other authorization by a person.(b) Renewal.--(1) A license issued under this part unless otherwise provided shall be subject to renewal every five years.(2) The application for renewal of a license, unless otherwise provided, must be submitted at least 180 days prior to the expiration of the permit or license and include an update of the information contained in the initial and any prior renewal applications and the payment of any renewal fee required under section 6101.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to relieve a licensee of the affirmative duty to notify the board of a change relating to the status of its license or to other information contained in the application materials on file with the board.(c) Revocation or failure to renew.--(1) In addition to other sanctions the board may impose under this part, the board may at its discretion suspend, revoke or deny renewal of a license issued under this part if it receives information from any source that the applicant or any of its officers, directors, owners or key employees is in violation of any provision of this part, that the applicant has furnished the board with false or misleading information or that the information contained in the applicant's initial application or renewal application is no longer true and correct such that the applicant is no longer eligible.(2) In the event of a revocation or failure to renew, the licensee's authorization to conduct the previously 20250HB1141PN1260 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved activity shall immediately cease the activity and all fees paid in connection with the license shall be forfeited.(3) In the event of a suspension, the applicant's authorization to conduct the previously approved activity shall immediately cease until the board has notified the applicant that the suspension is no longer in effect.(d) Nontransferability of licenses.--(1) A license issued by the board is a grant of the privilege to conduct a business in this Commonwealth.(2) Except as permitted by section 5516 (relating to change in ownership or control of licensee), a license granted or renewed under this part may not be sold, transferred or assigned to another person.(3) A licensee may not pledge or otherwise grant a security interest in or lien on the license.(4) The board has the sole discretion to issue, renew, condition or deny the issuance of a license based upon the requirements of this part.§ 55 16. Change in ownership or control of licensee. (a) Notification and approval.--(1) A licensee shall promptly notify the board of a proposed or contemplated change of ownership of the licensee by a person or group of persons acting in concert that involves any of the following:(i) More than 5% of a licensee's securities or other ownership interests.(ii) More than 5% of the securities or other ownership interests of a corporation or other form of business entity that owns directly or indirectly at least 20250HB1141PN1260 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 20% of the voting or other securities or other ownership interests of the licensee.(iii) The sale of all or substantially all of a licensee's assets.(iv) Other transaction or occurrence deemed by the board to be relevant to license qualifications.(2) (i) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), a licensee may not be required to notify the board of an acquisition by an institutional investor under paragraph (1)(i) or (ii) if the institutional investor holds less than 10% of the securities or other ownership interests referred to in paragraph (1)(i) or (ii), the securities or interests are publicly traded securities and its holdings of the securities were purchased for investment purposes only and the institutional investor files with the board a certified statement to the effect that it has no intention of influencing or affecting, directly or indirectly, the affairs of the licensee, provided, however, that it shall be permitted to vote on matters put to the vote of the outstanding security holders.(ii) Notice to the board and board approval shall be required prior to completion of a proposed or contemplated change of ownership of a terminal operator licensee that meets the criteria of this section.(iii) For the avoidance of doubt, the local gaming terminals installed at an establishment licensee's premises shall not be disabled at any time during the course or as a result of a change or ownership of an establishment licensee as described in this section.20250HB1141PN1260 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Qualification of purchaser of licensee; change of control.--(1) The purchaser of all or substantially all of the assets of a licensee shall, if not already a licensee, independently qualify for a license in accordance with this part and shall pay the license fee as required by section 6101 (relating to fees).(2) A change in control of a licensee shall require that the licensee independently qualify for a license in accordance with this part, and the licensee shall pay a new license fee as required by section 6101, except as otherwise required by the board under this section.(3) The new license fee shall be paid upon the assignment and actual change of control or ownership of the license.(4) The transferee shall be eligible for a conditional license if the transferee meets the requirements in section 5519 (relating to conditional licenses), pending final approval.(c) Fee reduction.--The board may, in its discretion, eliminate the need for qualification or proportionately reduce, but not eliminate, the new license fee otherwise required under this section in connection with a change of control of a licensee, depending upon the type of transaction, the relevant ownership interests and changes to the interests resulting from the transaction and other considerations deemed relevant by the board.(d) License revocation.--The board shall revoke or suspend a license if the licensee fails to comply with this section, unless the purchase of the assets or the change in control that 20250HB1141PN1260 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meets the criteria of this section has been independently qualified in advance by the board and any required license fee has been paid.(e) Definition.--For purposes of this section, the term "change in control of a licensee" means the acquisition by a person or group of persons acting in concert of more than 20% of a licensee's securities or other ownership interests, with the exception of any ownership interest of the person that existed at the time of initial licensing and payment of the initial gaming terminal license fee, or more than 20% of the securities or other ownership interests of a corporation or other form of business entity that owns directly or indirectly at least 20% of the voting or other securities or other ownership interests of the licensee.§ 55 17. Local gaming terminal accounting controls and audits. (a) Approval.--Except as otherwise provided by this part, an applicant for a terminal operator license shall, in addition to obtaining a terminal operator license, obtain approval from the board in consultation with the department of its internal control systems and audit protocols prior to the installation and operation of local gaming terminals at licensed establishments.(b) Minimum requirements.--The applicant's proposed internal controls and audit protocols shall, at a minimum:(1) Safeguard its assets and revenues, including, but not limited to, the recording of cash and cash equivalents and evidences of indebtedness related to the local gaming terminals.(2) Provide for reliable records, accounts and reports of a financial event that occurs in the operation of a local 20250HB1141PN1260 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 gaming terminal, including reports to the board related to the local gaming terminals. (3) Ensure that each local gaming terminal directly provides or communicates all required activities and financial details to the central control computer system as set by the board and the department.(4) Provide for accurate and reliable financial records.(5) Ensure that a financial event that occurs in the operation of a local gaming terminal is performed only in accordance with the management's general or specific authorization, as approved by the board.(6) Ensure that a financial event that occurs in the operation of a local gaming terminal is recorded adequately to permit proper and timely reporting of gross revenue and the calculation thereof and of fees and taxes and to maintain accountability for assets.(7) Ensure that access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's specific authorization, as approved by the board.(8) Ensure that recorded accountability for assets is compared with actual assets at intervals as required by the board and appropriate action is taken with respect to discrepancies.(9) Ensure that all functions, duties and responsibilities are appropriately segregated and performed, by competent, qualified personnel, in accordance with sound financial practices.(10) Meet any other requirement of the board or the department.(c) Internal control.--The applicant shall submit to the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board and department, in such manner as the board requires, a description of its administrative and accounting procedures in detail, including its written system of internal control. The written system of internal control shall include:(1) Records of direct and indirect ownership in the proposed terminal operator licensee, its affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company.(2) An organizational chart depicting appropriate segregation of employee functions and responsibilities.(3) A description of the duties and responsibilities of each employee position shown on the organizational chart.(4) A detailed narrative description of the administrative and accounting procedures designed to satisfy the requirements of this section.(5) Record retention policy.(6) Procedure to ensure that assets are safeguarded, including mandatory count procedures.(7) A statement signed by the chief financial officer of the applicant or other competent person and the chief executive officer of the terminal operator license applicant or other competent person attesting that the officer believes, in good faith, that the system satisfies the requirements of this section.(8) Other items that the board or department may require in its discretion.§ 5518 . Multiple licenses prohibited. (a) Manufacturer restriction.--A manufacturer licensee may not be licensed as an establishment or terminal operator and may not own, manage or control an establishment licensee or terminal operator licensee.20250HB1141PN1260 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Terminal operator restriction.--A terminal operator licensee may not be licensed as an establishment or a manufacturer and may not own, manage or control an establishment licensee or a manufacturer or supplier licensee. A supplier licensee may not be licensed as an establishment or terminal operator and may not own, manage or control an establishment licensee or terminal operator licensee.(c) Establishment restriction.--An establishment licensee may not be licensed as a manufacturer, supplier or a terminal operator.(d) Existing license.--Subject to subsections (a), (b) and (c), nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person or entity that has been approved by the board for licensure under Part II (relating to gaming) or III (relating to video gaming) from applying for and receiving a license under this part.§ 55 19. Conditional licenses. (a) Conditional establishment licenses.--(1) Within 45 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the board shall make applications for local gaming establishment licenses available to applicants.(2) Within 60 days after receipt of a complete application for a local gaming establishment license, the board shall issue a conditional license to an applicant for an establishment license if the applicant satisfies, as determined by the board, all of the following criteria:(i) The applicant has never been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction.(ii) The applicant is current on all State taxes.(iii) The applicant has submitted a completed 20250HB1141PN1260 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application for an establishment license in accordance with this part, which may be submitted concurrently with the applicant's request for a conditional license.(iv) The applicant has never been convicted of a gambling law violation in any jurisdiction.(v) The applicant attests that it does not have any unauthorized or illegal gambling devices at the premises or elsewhere within its control.(3) (i) The board shall issue a conditional license to an applicant for an establishment license within 60 days after the completed application has been received by the board, provided that the board determines that the criteria contained in paragraph (2) have been satisfied.(ii) If the board determines that the criteria contained in paragraph (2) have not been satisfied, the board shall give a written explanation to the applicant as to why it has determined the criteria have not been satisfied.(4) A conditional license shall be valid until:(i) the board either approves or denies the applicant's application for licensure;(ii) the conditional license is terminated for a violation of this part; or(iii) one calendar year has passed since the conditional license was issued.(5) The board may extend the duration of the conditional license for one calendar year.(6) An applicant must attest by way of affidavit under penalty of perjury that the applicant is not otherwise prohibited from licensure according to the requirements of 20250HB1141PN1260 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this section or any other provision of this part.(7) A request for conditional licensure under this subsection shall include payment of a $100 fee, which fee shall be in addition to the applicable fee required under section 6101 (relating to fees).(b) Conditional terminal operator licenses.--(1) Within 45 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the board shall make applications for terminal operator licenses available to applicants.(2) The board shall issue a conditional license to an applicant for a terminal operator license if the applicant satisfies, as determined by the board, all of the following criteria:(i) The applicant has never been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction.(ii) The applicant is current on all State taxes.(iii) The applicant has submitted a completed application for a terminal operator license which may be submitted concurrently with the applicant's request for a conditional license.(iv) The applicant has never had its terminal operator license or similar gaming license denied or revoked in another jurisdiction.(v) The applicant has never been convicted of a gambling law violation in any jurisdiction.(3) (i) The board shall issue a conditional license to an applicant for a terminal operator license within 60 days after the completed application has been received by the board, provided that the board determines that the criteria contained in paragraph (2) have been satisfied.20250HB1141PN1260 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) If the board determines that the criteria contained in paragraph (2) have not been satisfied, the board shall give a written explanation to the applicant as to why it has determined the criteria have not been satisfied.(4) A conditional license shall be valid until:(i) the board either approves or denies the applicant's application for licensure;(ii) the conditional license is terminated for a violation of this part; or(iii) one calendar year has passed since the conditional license was issued.(5) The board may extend the duration of the conditional license for one calendar year.(6) An applicant must attest by way of affidavit under penalty of perjury that the applicant is not otherwise prohibited from licensure according to the requirements of this subsection or any other provision of this part.(7) A request for conditional licensure under this subsection shall include payment of a $100 fee, which fee shall be in addition to the applicable fee required under section 6101.(c) Conditional manufacturer and supplier licenses.--(1) Within 45 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the board shall make applications available for manufacturer and supplier licenses.(2) The board shall issue a conditional license to an applicant for a manufacturer or supplier license if the applicant satisfies, as determined by the board, all of the following criteria:20250HB1141PN1260 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The applicant has never been convicted of a felony.(ii) The applicant is current on all State taxes.(iii) The applicant has submitted a completed application for a manufacturer or supplier license, which may be submitted concurrently with the applicant's request for a conditional license.(iv) The applicant has never had its manufacturer, supplier or similar gaming license denied or revoked in another jurisdiction.(v) The applicant has never been convicted of a gambling law violation in any jurisdiction.(3) (i) The board shall issue a conditional license to an applicant for a manufacturer or supplier license within 60 days after the completed application has been received by the board, provided that the board determines that the criteria contained in paragraph (2) have been satisfied.(ii) If the board determines that the criteria contained in paragraph (2) have not been satisfied, the board shall give a written explanation to the applicant as to why it has determined the criteria have not been satisfied.(4) A conditional license shall be valid until:(i) the board either approves or denies the applicant's application for licensure;(ii) the conditional license is terminated for a violation of this part; or(iii) one calendar year has passed since the conditional license was issued.20250HB1141PN1260 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The board may extend the duration of the conditional license for one calendar year.(6) An applicant shall attest by way of affidavit under penalty of perjury that the applicant is not otherwise prohibited from licensure according to the requirements of this subsection or any other provision of this part.(7) A request for a conditional license under this subsection shall include payment of a $1,000 fee, which fee shall be in addition to the applicable fee required under section 6101.(d) Other conditional licenses.--(1) Within 45 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the board shall make applications available for any other license required under this part.(2) The board shall issue a conditional license to an applicant if the applicant satisfies, as determined by the board, all of the following criteria:(i) The applicant has never been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction.(ii) The applicant is current on all State taxes.(iii) The applicant has submitted a completed application for licensure, which may be submitted concurrently with the applicant's request for a conditional license.(iv) The applicant has never been convicted of a gambling law violation in any jurisdiction.(3) (i) The board shall issue a conditional license to an applicant within 60 days after the completed application has been received by the board, provided that the board determines that the criteria contained in 20250HB1141PN1260 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph (2) have been satisfied.(ii) If the board determines that the criteria contained in paragraph (2) have not been satisfied, the board shall give a written explanation to the applicant as to why it has determined the criteria have not been satisfied.(4) A conditional license shall be valid until:(i) the board either approves or denies the applicant's application for licensure;(ii) the conditional license is terminated for a violation of this part; or(iii) one calendar year has passed since the conditional license was issued.(5) The board may extend the duration of the conditional license for one calendar year.(6) An applicant must attest by way of affidavit under penalty of perjury that the applicant is not otherwise prohibited from licensure according to the requirements of this subsection or any other provision of this part.(7) A request for conditional licensure under this subsection shall include payment of a $100 fee, which fee shall be in addition to the applicable fee required under section 6101.(e) Prioritization prohibited.--(1) The board may not utilize the alternative licensing standards for a terminal operator license or a manufacturer license under section 55 11 (relating to alternative local gaming terminal operator licensing standards), 55 12 (relating to alternative local gaming manufacturer licensing standards) or 5513 (relating to local gaming establishment licenses) to 20250HB1141PN1260 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prioritize the issuance of a terminal operator or manufacturer license.(2) The board shall ensure that applications made to the board according to the alternative standards under sections 55 11, 55 12 and 55 13 are not approved or denied in a time period that is less than the time period in which an application for a conditional license is approved or denied under this section.(f) Incomplete applications.--If the board receives an application that is incomplete, the board shall, within seven days of receiving the incomplete application, notify the applicant of additional information required by the board.CHAPTER 57OPERATIONSec.5701. Testing and certification of terminals.5702. Local gaming limitations.5703. Maximum number of local gaming terminals.5704. Terminal placement agreements.5705. Duties of licensees.5706. Compulsive and problem gambling.§ 57 01. Testing and certification of terminals. (a) General rule.--A local gaming terminal or redemption terminal or associated equipment may not be made available for use in this Commonwealth prior to being tested and certified by the board in accordance with this section.(b) Local gaming terminal specifications.--The board shall test and certify whether a local gaming terminal meets the following specifications:(1) The local gaming terminal shall have the ability to 20250HB1141PN1260 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be linked to the central control computer.(2) The local gaming terminal shall be marked with an irremovable identification plate that is placed in a conspicuous location on the exterior of the local gaming terminal. The identification plate shall contain the name of the manufacturer and the serial and model numbers of the local gaming terminal.(3) The local gaming terminal shall prominently display the rules of play either on the local gaming terminal face or screen.(4) The local gaming terminal may not have the ability to dispense cash, tokens or anything of value, except redemption tickets which shall only be exchangeable for cash at a redemption terminal or reinserted into another local gaming terminal located in the same local gaming area as the local gaming terminal.(5) The cost of a credit shall only be 1¢, 5¢, 10¢ or 25¢.(6) The maximum wager per individual game shall not exceed $5.(7) The maximum prize per individual game shall be $1.00 less than the limits denoted in the IRS Federal W2G reporting threshold.(8) The local gaming terminal shall be designed and manufactured with total accountability to include gross proceeds, net profits, winning percentages and other information the board requires.(9) The local gaming terminal shall pay out a minimum of 85% of the amount wagered.(10) Other specifications the board requires.20250HB1141PN1260 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Redemption terminal specifications.--The board shall test and certify whether a redemption terminal meets the following specifications:(1) The redemption terminal shall be marked with an irremovable identification plate that is placed in a conspicuous location on the exterior of the redemption terminal. The identification plate shall contain the name of the manufacturer and the serial and model numbers of the redemption terminal.(2) The redemption terminal shall only accept redemption tickets from local gaming terminals located in the same local gaming area.(3) The redemption terminal shall be designed and manufactured with total accountability to record information the board requires.(4) Other specifications the board requires.(d) Use of other state standards.--(1) The board may determine, in its discretion, whether the local gaming terminal or redemption terminal testing and certification standards of another jurisdiction within the United States in which a manufacturer licensee is licensed are comprehensive and thorough and provide similar adequate safeguards as those required by this part.(2) If the board makes the determination under paragraph (1), the board may permit a licensee to deploy the local gaming terminals or redemption terminals which have met the local gaming terminal or redemption terminal testing and certification standards in such other jurisdictions without undergoing the full testing and certification process by the board's testing facility.20250HB1141PN1260 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) In the event local gaming terminals or redemption terminals of a licensee are licensed in the other jurisdiction, the board may determine to use an abbreviated process requiring only that information determined by the board to be necessary to consider the issuance of a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal certification to the applicant.(e) Private testing.--The board may, in its discretion, rely upon the certification of a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal that has met the testing and certification standards of one or more board-approved independent private testing and certification facilities.(f) Testing and certification fee.--(1) A fee for the testing and certification of a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal shall be paid by the licensee submitting the terminal. The fee shall be an amount established by the board according to a schedule adopted by the board.(2) Fees established by the board shall be exempt from any fee limitation contained in section 6101 (relating to fees).(g) Central control computer compatibility.--The board shall ensure that all local gaming terminals certified and approved for use in this Commonwealth are compatible and comply with the central control computer and protocol specifications approved by the department.§ 57 02. Local gaming limitations. (a) Establishment licensee limitations.--A local gaming establishment licensee may offer local gaming terminals for play within its premises, subject to the following:20250HB1141PN1260 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) No more than five local gaming terminals may be placed on the premises of a licensed establishment . (1.1) An establishment licensee must employ at least one gaming employee. An establishment licensee is not required to have a gaming employee on premises during the conduct of local gaming at the establishment.(2) Redemption tickets shall only be exchanged for cash through a redemption terminal or reinserted into another local gaming terminal in the same local gaming area or as otherwise authorized by the board in the event of a failure or malfunction in a redemption terminal, and at least one redemption terminal shall be located in the local gaming area.(3) Local gaming terminals located on the premises of the establishment licensee shall be placed and operated by a terminal operator licensee in accordance with a terminal placement agreement executed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(4) A local gaming terminal may not be located in an area that is not properly segregated from minors.(5) A local gaming terminal shall be secure and visible by employees of the establishment licensee at all times.(6) The local gaming area shall at all times be monitored by an employee of the establishment licensee, either directly or through live monitoring of video surveillance. The employee monitor must be at least 18 years of age and have completed the mandatory training program required in section 5706 (relating to compulsive and problem gambling).(7) An establishment licensee may not provide an 20250HB1141PN1260 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 incentive.(8) A minor may not be permitted to play a local gaming terminal or enter the local gaming area.(9) A visibly intoxicated person may not be permitted to play a local gaming terminal.(10) An establishment licensee may not extend credit or accept a credit card or debit card for play of a local gaming terminal.(11) An establishment licensee may not make structural alterations or significant renovations to a local gaming area unless the establishment licensee has notified the terminal operator licensee and obtained prior approval from the board.(12) An establishment licensee may not move or disconnect a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal after installation by a terminal operator licensee.(b) Terminal operator licensee limitations.--A terminal operator licensee may place and operate local gaming terminals on the premises of an establishment licensee, subject to the following:(1) Redemption tickets shall only be exchanged for cash through a redemption terminal located within the same local gaming area or reinserted into another local gaming terminal located in the same local gaming area as the local gaming terminal.(2) Local gaming terminals located on the premises of the establishment licensee shall be placed and operated in accordance with a terminal placement agreement.(3) A terminal operator licensee may not provide an incentive.(4) A terminal operator licensee may not extend credit 20250HB1141PN1260 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or accept a credit card or debit card for play of a local gaming terminal.(5) A terminal operator licensee may not give or offer to give, directly or indirectly, any type of inducement to a local gaming establishment to secure or maintain a terminal placement agreement.(6) A terminal operator licensee may only operate, install or otherwise make available for public use a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal that has been obtained from a manufacturer licensee or supplier licensee. A terminal operator licensee may operate an approved redemption terminal of its own manufacturing. Terminal operator licensees may not sell its own redemption terminal to any other licensee.(7) A terminal operator licensee may not make structural alterations or significant renovations to a local gaming area unless the terminal operator licensee has notified the establishment licensee and obtained prior approval from the board.(8) A terminal operator licensee may not move a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal after installation unless prior approval is obtained from the board.§ 57 03. Maximum number of local gaming terminals. The board may authorize a maximum of 30,000 local gaming terminals for placement and play at licensed establishments.§ 57 04. Terminal placement agreements. (a) Placement approval.--A terminal operator licensee may not place and operate local gaming terminals on the premises of an establishment licensee unless in accordance with a terminal placement agreement approved by the board and executed after the effective date of this subsection. Approval shall be presented 20250HB1141PN1260 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upon connection of one or more local gaming terminals at the establishment licensee to the central control computer.(b) Form of agreement.--The board shall establish through regulation minimum standards for terminal placement agreements.(c) Length of agreement.--Terminal placement agreements shall be valid for a minimum 60-month term and not exceed a 120-month term.(d) Provisions required.--A terminal placement agreement shall include a provision that:(1) Renders the agreement invalid if either the terminal operator license or terminal operator application or the establishment license or establishment licensee application is denied, revoked, not renewed, withdrawn or surrendered.(2) Outlines the financial responsibilities of both licensees based upon the requirements outlined in sections 6102 (relating to regulatory assessments) and 6103 (relating to local gaming terminal tax) herein.(3) Identifies the procurement agent who solicited the terminal placement agreement on behalf of a terminal operator licensee or applicant.(e) Parties to agreement.--Only an eligible establishment or establishment licensee may sign or agree to sign a terminal placement agreement with an applicant holding conditional approval for a terminal operator license or a terminal operator licensee.(f) Void agreements.--An agreement entered into by an eligible establishment or terminal operator prior to the effective date of this subsection with a person or entity for the placement, operation, service or maintenance of local gaming terminals, including an agreement granting a person or entity 20250HB1141PN1260 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the right to enter into an agreement or match any offer made after the effective date of this subsection shall be void and shall not be approved by the board.(g) Transferability of agreements.--A terminal placement agreement may not be transferred or assigned unless the individual or entity making the assignment is either a terminal operator applicant or terminal operator licensee and the individual or entity receiving the assignment of the terminal placement agreement is either a terminal operator applicant or terminal operator licensee under this chapter.§ 57 05. Duties of licensees. A person issued a license shall:(1) Provide assistance or information required by the board, the bureau, the department or the Pennsylvania State Police, and to cooperate in inquiries, investigations and hearings.(2) Consent to inspections, searches and seizures.(3) Inform the board of actions that the person believes would constitute a violation of this part.(4) Inform the board of arrests for violations of offenses enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses).(5) Report illegal or unlicensed games or devices to the board.§ 57 06. Compulsive and problem gambling. (a) Required posting.--(1) An establishment licensee shall conspicuously post signs similar to the following statement:If you or someone you know has a gambling problem, help is available. Call (Toll-free telephone number) 20250HB1141PN1260 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or Text (Toll-free telephone number).(2) At least one sign shall be posted within the local gaming area and at least one sign shall be posted within five feet of each automated teller machine located within the establishment licensee's premises, if applicable.(b) Toll-free telephone number.--The toll-free telephone number required to be posted under subsection (a) shall be the same number maintained by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency under section 5310 (relating to Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency).(c) Problem gambling information.--(1) An establishment licensee shall have available on its premises access to materials regarding compulsive and problem gambling assistance.(2) The available materials required by paragraph (1) shall be a uniform, Statewide handout developed by the board in consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency.(3) The available materials required by paragraph (1) shall be displayed conspicuously at least within the local gaming area.(d) Mandatory training.--(1) The board's Office of Compulsive and Problem Gambling, in consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency, shall develop a mandatory training program for employees and management of an establishment licensee. The training program shall address responsible gaming and other compulsive and problem gambling issues related to local gaming terminals.(2) The board shall establish a fee to cover the cost of 20250HB1141PN1260 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the mandatory training program.(e) Penalty.-- An establishment licensee that fails to fulfill the requirements of subsection (a), (b), (c) or (d) shall be assessed by the board an administrative penalty in an amount established by the board in its discretion and may have its establishment license suspended depending on the severity and length of noncompliance.CHAPTER 59ENFORCEMENTSec.5901. Exclusion or ejection of certain persons.5902. Repeat offenders.5903. Self-exclusion.5904. Investigations and enforcement.5905. Prohibited acts and penalties.5906. Report of suspicious transactions.5907. Additional authority.5908. Detention.§ 59 01. Exclusion or ejection of certain persons. (a) Regulatory list.--The board shall by regulation provide for the establishment of a list of persons who are to be excluded or ejected from the local gaming area of an establishment licensee. The provisions shall define the standards for exclusion and shall include standards relating to persons who are career or professional offenders as defined by regulations of the board or whose presence in a local gaming area would, in the opinion of the board, be inimical to the interest of the Commonwealth or of licensed local gaming in this Commonwealth, or both.(b) Categories to be defined.--The board shall promulgate 20250HB1141PN1260 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definitions establishing categories of persons who shall be excluded or ejected in accordance with this section, including cheats and persons whose privileges for licensure, certification, permit or registration have been revoked.(c) Discrimination prohibited.--Race, color, creed, national origin or ancestry or sex shall not be a reason for placing the name of a person upon a list under this section.(d) Prevention of access.--The board shall, in consultation with terminal operator licensees and establishment licensees, develop policies and procedures to reasonably prevent persons on the list required by this section from entering a local gaming area.(e) Sanctions.--The board may impose sanctions upon an establishment licensee in accordance with this part if the establishment licensee knowingly fails to implement the policies and procedures established by the board under subsection (d).(f) List not all-inclusive.--A list compiled by the board under this section shall not be deemed an all-inclusive list, and an establishment licensee shall keep from the local gaming area persons known to the establishment licensee to be within the classifications declared in this section and the regulations promulgated under this section whose presence in a local gaming area would be inimical to the interest of the Commonwealth or of licensed local gaming in this Commonwealth, or both, as defined in standards established by the board.(g) Notice.--If the bureau decides to place the name of a person on a list under this section, the bureau shall serve notice of the decision to the person by personal service or certified mail at the last known address of the person. The notice shall inform the person of the right to request a hearing 20250HB1141PN1260 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under subsection (h).(h) Hearing.--(1) Within 30 days after receipt of notice in accordance with subsection (g), the person named for exclusion or ejection may demand a hearing before the board, at which hearing the bureau must demonstrate that the person named for exclusion or ejection satisfies the criteria for exclusion or ejection established by this section and the board's regulations.(2) Failure of the person to demand a hearing within 30 days after service shall be deemed an admission of all matters and facts alleged in the bureau's notice and shall preclude the person from having an administrative hearing, but shall in no way affect the right to judicial review as provided in this section.(i) Review.--(1) If, upon completion of a hearing on the notice of exclusion or ejection, the board determines that placement of the name of the person on the exclusion or ejection list is appropriate, the board shall make and enter an order to that effect.(2) The order shall be subject to review by Commonwealth Court in accordance with the rules of court.§ 59 02. Repeat offenders. (a) Discretion to exclude or eject.--An establishment licensee may exclude or eject from the establishment licensee's local gaming area or premises a person who is known to the establishment licensee to have been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony committed in or on the premises of a licensed establishment.20250HB1141PN1260 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Construction.--Nothing in this section or in any other law of this Commonwealth shall be construed to limit the right of an establishment licensee to exercise its common law right to exclude or eject permanently from its local gaming area or premises a person who:(1) disrupts the operations of its premises;(2) threatens the security of its premises or its occupants; or(3) is disorderly or intoxicated.§ 59 03. Self-exclusion. (a) Establishment of list.--(1) The board shall provide by regulation for the establishment of a list of persons self-excluded from local gaming activities within specific establishment licensees or establishment licensees in geographic areas of this Commonwealth.(2) A person may request placement on the list of self-excluded persons by:(i) acknowledging in a manner to be established by the board that the person is a problem gambler;(ii) agreeing that, during any period of voluntary exclusion, the person may not collect any winnings or recover any losses resulting from any local gaming activity within establishment licensees and that person may be subject to arrest for trespass; and(iii) agreeing to another condition established by the board.(b) Regulations.--The regulations of the board shall establish:(1) Procedures for placement on and removal from the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 list of a self-excluded person.(2) Procedures for the transmittal to establishment licensees of identifying information concerning a self-excluded person and shall require establishment licensees to establish reasonable procedures designed at a minimum to prevent entry of a self-excluded person into the local gaming area of an establishment licensee, provided that the board shall not require local gaming terminals to be equipped with identification card-reading devices or require establishment licensees to purchase identification card-reading devices.(3) Procedures for the transmittal to terminal operator licensees of identifying information concerning a self-excluded person and shall require terminal operator licensees to establish procedures to remove self-excluded persons from customer loyalty or reward card programs and targeted mailings or other forms of advertising or promotions, provided that the board shall not require local gaming terminals to be equipped with identification card-reading devices or require terminal operator licensees to purchase identification card-reading devices.(c) Liability.--An establishment licensee or employee of an establishment licensee shall not be liable to a self-excluded person or to another party in a judicial proceeding for harm, monetary or otherwise, which may arise as a result of:(1) the failure of the establishment licensee to withhold local gaming privileges from or restore local gaming privileges to the self-excluded person; or(2) otherwise permitting or not permitting the self-excluded person to engage in local gaming activity within the establishment licensee's premises while on the list of self-20250HB1141PN1260 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 excluded persons.(d) Nondisclosure.--Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the board's list of self-excluded persons shall not be open to public inspection.§ 59 04. Investigations and enforcement. (a) Powers and duties of bureau.--The bureau shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Enforce the provisions of this part.(2) Investigate and review applicants and applications for a license or registration. The bureau shall be prohibited from disclosing any portion of a background investigation report to a member of the board prior to the submission of the bureau's final background investigation report relating to the applicant's suitability for licensure to the board. The Office of Enforcement Counsel, on behalf of the bureau, shall prepare the final background investigation report for inclusion in a final report relating to the applicant's suitability for licensure.(3) Investigate licensees, registrants and other persons regulated by the board under this part for noncriminal violations of this part, including potential violations referred to the bureau by the board or other person.(4) Monitor local gaming operations to ensure compliance with this part.(5) Inspect and examine licensed entities. Inspections may include the review and reproduction of documents or records.(6) Conduct reviews of a licensed entity as necessary to ensure compliance with this part. A review may include the review of accounting, administrative and financial records, 20250HB1141PN1260 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 management control systems, procedures and other records utilized by a licensed entity.(7) Refer possible criminal violations of this title or 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) to the Pennsylvania State Police. The bureau shall not have the power of arrest.(8) Cooperate in the investigation and prosecution of criminal violations related to this part or 18 Pa.C.S.(9) Be a criminal justice agency under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information).(b) Office of Enforcement Counsel.--The board's Office of Enforcement Counsel shall act as the prosecutor in all noncriminal enforcement actions initiated by the bureau under this part and shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Advise the bureau on all matters, including the granting of licenses or registrations, the conduct of background investigations, audits and inspections and the investigation of potential violations of this part and the referral of criminal violations of 18 Pa.C.S. or this title to the Pennsylvania State Police.(2) File on behalf of the bureau recommendations and objections relating to the issuance of licenses and registrations.(3) Initiate, in its sole discretion, proceedings for noncriminal violations of this part by filing a complaint or other pleading with the board.(c) Powers and duties of department.--(1) The department shall at all times have the power of access to examine and audit equipment and records relating to all aspects of the operation of local gaming terminals and 20250HB1141PN1260 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 redemption terminals under this part.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 353(f) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, the department shall supply the board, the bureau, the Pennsylvania State Police and the Office of Attorney General with information concerning the status of delinquent taxes owed by applicants or licensees.(d) Powers and duties of Pennsylvania State Police.--The board may not require the Pennsylvania State Police to have an office located within a licensed facility. The Pennsylvania State Police shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Promptly conduct background investigations on persons as directed by the board under this part. The Pennsylvania State Police may contract with other law enforcement annuitants to assist in the conduct of investigations under this paragraph.(2) Initiate proceedings for criminal violations of this part or 18 Pa.C.S.(3) Provide the board with all information necessary for all actions under this part for all proceedings involving criminal enforcement of this part.(4) Inspect, when appropriate, a licensee's person and personal effects present within an establishment licensee's premises under this part while that licensee is present.(5) Enforce the criminal provisions of this part and all other criminal laws of this Commonwealth.(6) Fingerprint applicants.(7) Exchange fingerprint data with and receive national criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation for use in background investigations 20250HB1141PN1260 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 performed by the bureau under this part.(8) Receive and take appropriate action on any referral relating to criminal conduct in violation of this title or 18 Pa.C.S.(9) Conduct administrative inspections on the premises of an establishment licensee at such times, under such circumstances and to such extent as the bureau determines to ensure compliance with this part and the regulations of the board and, in the course of inspections, review and make copies of all documents and records required by the inspection through onsite observation and other reasonable means to ensure compliance with this part and regulations promulgated under this part.(10) Conduct audits or verification of information of local gaming terminal operations at such times, under such circumstances and to such extent as the bureau determines. This paragraph includes the review of accounting, administrative and financial records and management control systems, procedures and records utilized by a terminal operator licensee.(11) Assign members of the Pennsylvania State Police to duties of enforcement under this part. The assigned members shall not be counted toward the complement as provided in section 205 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(12) Report to the General Assembly. By March 1 of each year, the Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police shall submit a report to the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the Community, Economic and Recreational 20250HB1141PN1260 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Development Committee of the Senate and the Gaming Oversight Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall summarize all law enforcement activities at each establishment licensee during the previous calendar year and shall include all of the following:(i) The number of arrests made and citations issued at each licensed establishment and unlicensed establishment and the name of the law enforcement agency making the arrests or issuing the citations.(ii) A list of specific offenses charged for each arrest made or citation issued.(iii) The number of criminal prosecutions resulting from arrests made or citations issued.(iv) The number of convictions resulting from prosecutions reported under subparagraph (iii).(13) Report violations of this part to the bureau that are found during the normal course of duties required under any law of this Commonwealth.(e) Powers and duties of Attorney General.--The Gaming Unit within the Office of Attorney General shall investigate and institute criminal proceedings as authorized under subsection (f).(f) Criminal action.--(1) The district attorneys of the several counties shall have authority to investigate and institute criminal proceedings for a violation of this part, 18 Pa.C.S. or any other law of this Commonwealth.(2) In addition to the authority conferred upon the Attorney General under the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Attorney General shall have the authority to investigate and, following consultation with the appropriate district attorney, institute criminal proceedings for a violation of this part.(3) A person charged with a violation of this part by the Attorney General shall not have standing to challenge the authority of the Attorney General to investigate or prosecute the case, and, if any such challenge is made, the challenge shall be dismissed and no relief shall be available in the courts of this Commonwealth to the person making the challenge.(g) Regulatory action.--Nothing contained in subsection (e) shall be construed to limit the existing regulatory or investigative authority of an agency or the Commonwealth whose functions relate to persons or matters within the scope of this part.(h) Inspection, seizure and warrants.--(1) The board, the bureau, the department and the Pennsylvania State Police shall have the authority without notice and without warrant to do all of the following in the performance of their duties under this part:(i) Inspect and examine all premises where local gaming operations are conducted, where local gaming terminals, redemption terminals and associated equipment are manufactured, sold, distributed or serviced or where records of these activities are prepared or maintained.(ii) Inspect all equipment and supplies in, about, upon or around premises referred to in subparagraph (i).(iii) Seize, summarily remove and impound equipment and supplies from premises referred to in subparagraph 20250HB1141PN1260 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) for the purposes of examination and inspection.(iv) Inspect, examine and audit all books, records and documents pertaining to a terminal operator licensee's local gaming operation. (v) Seize, impound or assume physical control of any book, record, ledger or device related to local gaming operations or the local gaming terminals or redemption terminals.(2) The provisions of paragraph (1) shall not be construed to limit warrantless inspections except in accordance with constitutional requirements.(3) To further effectuate the purposes of this part, the bureau and the Pennsylvania State Police may obtain administrative warrants for the inspection and seizure of property possessed, controlled, bailed or otherwise held by an applicant, licensee, intermediary, subsidiary, affiliate or holding company.(i) Information sharing and enforcement referral.--With respect to the administration, supervision and enforcement of this part, the bureau, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Office of Attorney General may obtain or provide pertinent information regarding applicants or licensees from or to law enforcement entities or gaming authorities of the Commonwealth and other domestic, foreign or federally approved jurisdictions, including the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and may transmit the information to each other electronically.§ 59 05. Prohibited acts and penalties. (a) Criminal offenses.--(1) The provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4902 (relating to perjury), 4903 (relating to false swearing) or 4904 (relating 20250HB1141PN1260 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to unsworn falsification to authorities) shall apply to a person providing information or making a statement, whether written or oral, to the board, the bureau, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Office of Attorney General, as required by this part.(2) It shall be unlawful for a person to willfully:(i) fail to report, pay or truthfully account for and pay over a license fee, authorization fee, tax or assessment imposed under this part; or(ii) attempt in any manner to evade or defeat a license fee, authorization fee, tax or assessment imposed under this part.(3) It shall be unlawful for a licensed entity, key employee or any other person to permit a local gaming terminal to be operated, transported, repaired or opened on the premises of an establishment licensee by a person other than a person licensed or permitted by the board under this part.(4) In accordance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 5513 (relating to gambling devices, gambling, etc.), it shall be unlawful for a licensed entity or other person to manufacture, supply or place any illegal gambling device or any local gaming terminal, redemption terminal or associated equipment into play or display local gaming terminal, redemption terminal or associated equipment on the premises of an establishment without the authority of the board.(5) It shall be unlawful for a licensed entity or other person to manufacture, supply, operate, carry on or expose for play an illegal gambling device or local gaming terminal or associated equipment after the person's license has 20250HB1141PN1260 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expired or failed to be renewed in accordance with this part.(6) It shall be unlawful for an individual while on the premises of an establishment licensee to knowingly use currency other than lawful coin or legal tender of the United States or a coin not of the same denomination as the coin intended to be used in the local gaming terminal or use a counterfeit or altered redemption ticket with the intent to cheat or defraud a terminal operator licensee or the Commonwealth or damage the local gaming terminal or redemption terminal.(7) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), it shall be unlawful for an individual to use or possess a cheating or thieving device, counterfeit or altered billet, ticket, token or similar object accepted by a local gaming terminal or counterfeit or altered redemption ticket on the premises of an establishment licensee.(ii) An authorized employee of a licensee or an employee of the board may possess and use a cheating or thieving device, counterfeit or altered billet, ticket, token or similar object accepted by a local gaming terminal or counterfeit or altered redemption ticket in performance of the duties of employment.(8) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), it shall be unlawful for an individual to knowingly possess or use while on the premises of an establishment licensee a key or device designed for the purpose of and suitable for opening or entering a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal that is located on the premises of the establishment licensee.20250HB1141PN1260 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) An authorized employee of a licensee or a member of the board may possess and use a device referred to in subparagraph (i) in the performance of the duties of employment.(9) It shall be unlawful for a person or licensed entity to possess a device, equipment or material which the person or licensed entity knows has been manufactured, distributed, sold, tampered with or serviced in violation of this part with the intent to use the device, equipment or material as though it had been manufactured, distributed, sold, tampered with or serviced under this part.(10) It shall be unlawful for a person to sell, offer for sale, represent or pass off as lawful any device, equipment or material that the person or licensed entity knows has been manufactured, distributed, sold, tampered with or serviced in violation of this part.(11) It shall be unlawful for an individual to work or be employed in a position the duties of which would require licensing under this part without first obtaining the requisite license issued under this part.(12) It shall be unlawful for a licensed entity to employ or continue to employ an individual in a position the duties of which require a license under this part if the individual:(i) Is not licensed under this part.(ii) Is prohibited from accepting employment from a licensee.(13) It shall be unlawful for a minor to enter and remain in a local gaming area, except that an individual at least 18 years of age employed by a terminal operator 20250HB1141PN1260 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensee, a gaming service provider, an establishment licensee, the board or another regulatory or emergency response agency may enter and remain in the area while engaged in the performance of the individual's employment duties.(14) It shall be unlawful for a minor to wager, play or attempt to play a local gaming terminal or submit a redemption ticket into a redemption terminal.(15) It shall be unlawful for a terminal operator licensee to require a local gaming terminal wager to be greater than the stated minimum wager or greater than the stated maximum wager.(16) An individual who engages in conduct prohibited by 18 Pa.C.S. § 6308 (relating to purchase, consumption, possession or transportation of liquor or malt or brewed beverages) on the premises of an establishment licensee commits a nongambling offense.(17) It shall be unlawful for an individual to claim, collect or take, or attempt to claim, collect or take, money or anything of value in or from a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal with the intent to defraud, or to claim, collect or take an amount greater than the amount won, or to manipulate with the intent to cheat, a component of a local gaming terminal or redemption terminal in a manner contrary to the designed and normal operational purpose.(b) Criminal penalties and fines.--(1) (i) A person that commits a first offense in violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4902, 4903 or 4904 in connection with providing information or making a statement, whether written or oral, to the board, the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bureau, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General or a district attorney as required by this part commits an offense to be graded in accordance with the applicable section violated. A person that is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4902, 4903 or 4904 in connection with providing information or making any statement, whether written or oral, to the board, the bureau, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General or a district attorney as required by this part commits a felony of the second degree.(ii) A person that violates subsection (a)(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12) or (17) commits a misdemeanor of the first degree. A person that is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a)(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12) or (17) commits a felony of the second degree.(2) (i) For a first violation of subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12) or (17), a person shall be sentenced to pay a fine of:(A) not less than $75,000 nor more than $150,000 if the person is an individual or establishment licensee;(B) not less than $300,000 nor more than $600,000 if the person is a terminal operator licensee; or(C) not less than $150,000 nor more than $300,000 if the person is a licensed manufacturer or supplier.20250HB1141PN1260 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) For a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12) or (17), a person shall be sentenced to pay a fine of:(A) not less than $150,000 nor more than $300,000 if the person is an individual or establishment licensee;(B) not less than $600,000 nor more than $1,200,000 if the person is a terminal operator licensee; or(C) not less than $300,000 nor more than $600,000 if the person is a licensed manufacturer or supplier.(3) An individual who commits an offense in violation of subsection (a)(13) or (14) commits a nongambling summary offense and upon conviction of a first offense shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $200 nor more than $1,000. An individual who is convicted of a second or subsequent offense under subsection (a)(13) or (14) shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $1,500. In addition to the fine imposed, an individual convicted of an offense under subsection (a)(13) or (14) may be sentenced to perform a period of community service not to exceed 40 hours.(4) An individual who commits an offense in violation of subsection (a)(16) commits a nongambling offense to be graded in accordance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 6308 and shall be subject to the same penalties imposed under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6308 except that the fine imposed for a violation of subsection (a)(16) shall be not less than $350 nor more than $1,000.20250HB1141PN1260 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Board-imposed administrative sanctions.--(1) In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, the board may impose without limitation the following sanctions:(i) Revoke the license of a person convicted of a criminal offense under this part or regulations promulgated under this part or committing any other offense or violation of this part or applicable law that would otherwise disqualify the person from holding the license.(ii) Revoke the license of a person determined to have violated a provision of this part or regulations promulgated under this part that would otherwise disqualify the person from holding the license.(iii) Revoke the license of a person for willfully and knowingly violating or attempting to violate an order of the board directed to the person.(iv) Subject to subsection (g), assess administrative penalties as necessary to punish violations of this part.(v) Order restitution of money or property unlawfully obtained or retained by a licensee.(vi) Enter cease and desist orders which specify the conduct to be discontinued, altered or implemented by a licensee.(vii) Issue letters of reprimand or censure, which letters shall be made a permanent part of the file of the licensee so sanctioned.(2) (i) If the board refuses to issue or renew a license, suspends or revokes a license, assesses civil 20250HB1141PN1260 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 penalties, orders restitution, enters a cease and desist order or issues a letter of reprimand or censure, the board shall provide the applicant or licensee with written notification of its decision, including a statement of the reasons for its decision, by certified mail within five business days of the decision of the board.(ii) The applicant or licensee shall have the right to appeal the decision in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(d) Aiding and abetting.--A person who aids, abets, counsels, commands, induces, procures or causes another person to violate this part shall be subject to all sanctions and penalties, both civil and criminal, provided under this part.(e) Continuing offenses.--A violation of this part that is determined to be an offense of a continuing nature shall be deemed to be a separate offense on each event or day during which the violation occurs.(f) Property subject to seizure, confiscation, destruction or forfeiture.--Any equipment, device or apparatus, money, material, gaming proceeds or substituted proceeds or real or personal property used, obtained or received or an attempt to use, obtain or receive the device, apparatus, money, material, proceeds or real or personal property in violation of this part shall be subject to seizure, confiscation, destruction or forfeiture.(g) Penalty limitation.--(1) Administrative penalties assessed by the board on an 20250HB1141PN1260 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establishment licensee shall not exceed $5,000 for each noncriminal violation of this part.(2) When imposing an administrative penalty on an establishment licensee for a noncriminal violation of this part, the board shall take into consideration the establishment licensee's annual taxable income and whether the penalty amount would cause the establishment licensee to cease non local gaming operations. (h) Deposit of fines.--Fines imposed and collected by the board under subsection (c) shall be deposited into the General Fund.§ 59 06. Report of suspicious transactions. (a) Duty.--An establishment licensee or terminal operator licensee or a person acting on behalf of an establishment licensee or terminal operator licensee shall, on a form and in a manner as required by the bureau, notify the bureau of a suspicious transaction.(b) Failure to report.--(1) A person that is required to file a report of a suspicious transaction under this section and knowingly fails to file the report or that knowingly causes another person having that responsibility to fail to file the report commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) A person required to file a report of a suspicious transaction under this section and fails to file the report or a person that causes another person required under this section to file the report to fail to file the report shall be strictly liable for the person's actions and may be subject to sanction under section 59 05(c) (relating to prohibited acts and penalties).20250HB1141PN1260 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Bureau.--The bureau shall maintain a record of all reports made under this section for a period of five years. The bureau shall make the reports available to any Federal or State law enforcement agency upon written request and without necessity of subpoena.(d) Notice prohibited.--(1) A person that is required to file a report of a suspicious transaction under this section may not notify an individual suspected of committing the suspicious transaction that the transaction has been reported.(2) A person that violates this subsection commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and may be subject to sanction under section 59 05(c). (e) Immunity.--A person that is required to file a report of a suspicious transaction under this section and in good faith makes the report shall not be liable in any civil action brought by a person for making the report, regardless of whether the transaction is later determined to be a suspicious transaction.(f) Sanctions.--(1) In considering appropriate administrative sanctions against a person for violating this section, the board shall consider all of the following factors:(i) The risk to the public and to the integrity of gaming operations created by the conduct of the person.(ii) The seriousness of the conduct of the person and whether the conduct was purposeful and with knowledge that it was in contravention of this part or regulations promulgated under this part.(iii) Justification or excuse for the conduct by the person.20250HB1141PN1260 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) The prior history of the particular licensee or person involved with respect to local gaming terminal activity.(v) The corrective action taken by the establishment licensee or terminal operator licensee to prevent future misconduct of a like nature from occurring.(vi) In the case of a monetary penalty, the amount of the penalty in relation to the severity of the misconduct and the financial means of the licensee or person. The board may impose any schedule or terms of payment of such penalty as it may deem appropriate.(2) It shall be no defense to disciplinary action before the board that a person inadvertently, unintentionally or unknowingly violated this section. The factors enumerated under paragraph (1) shall only apply to the degree of the penalty to be imposed by the board and not to a finding of a violation itself.(g) Regulations.--The board shall promulgate regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section.§ 59 07. Additional authority. (a) Petition for access to agency information.--(1) The director of the Office of Enforcement Counsel within the bureau may petition a court of record having jurisdiction over information in the possession of an agency in this Commonwealth or, if there is no such court, the Commonwealth Court for authorization to review or obtain information in the possession of an agency in this Commonwealth by averring specific facts demonstrating that:(i) The agency has in its possession information material to a pending investigation or inquiry being 20250HB1141PN1260 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conducted by the bureau pursuant to this part.(ii) Disclosure or release of the information is in the best interest of the Commonwealth.(2) The petition shall request that the court enter a rule upon the agency to show cause why the agency should not be directed to disclose to the bureau, or identified agents of the bureau, information in the agency's possession about any pending matter under the jurisdiction of the bureau under this part.(3) If the respondent is a local agency, a copy of a rule issued under this section shall be provided to the district attorney of the county in which the local agency is located and the Office of Attorney General.(4) Upon request of a local agency, the district attorney or the Attorney General may elect to enter an appearance to represent the local agency in the proceedings.(b) Procedure.--(1) The filing of a petition under this section and related proceedings shall be in accordance with court rule, including issuance as of course.(2) A party to the proceeding may not disclose the filing of a petition or answer or the receipt, content or disposition of a rule or order issued under this section, without leave of court.(3) A party to the proceedings may request that the record be sealed and proceedings be closed. The court shall grant the request if it is in the best interest of a person or the Commonwealth to do so.(c) Court determination.--(1) Following review of the record, the court shall 20250HB1141PN1260 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grant the relief sought by the director of the Office of Enforcement Counsel if the court determines that:(i) The agency has in its possession information material to the investigation or inquiry.(ii) Disclosure or release of the information is in the best interest of the Commonwealth.(iii) The disclosure or release of the information is not otherwise prohibited by statute or regulation.(iv) The disclosure or release of the information would not inhibit an agency in the performance of the agency's duties.(2) If the court so determines, the court shall enter an order authorizing and directing the information be made available for review in camera.(d) Release of materials or information.--(1) If, after an in-camera review by the court, the director of the Office of Enforcement Counsel seeks to obtain copies of materials in the agency's possession, the court may, if not otherwise prohibited by statute or regulation, enter an order that the requested materials be provided.(2) An order authorizing the release of materials or other information shall contain direction regarding the safekeeping and use of the materials or other information sufficient to satisfy the court that the materials or information will be sufficiently safeguarded.(3) In making the determination under paragraph (2) the court shall consider input of the agency in possession of the information and input from any agency with which the information originated concerning a pending investigation or ongoing matter and the safety of person and property.20250HB1141PN1260 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Modification of order.--(1) If subsequent investigation or inquiry by the bureau warrants modification of an order entered under this section, the director of the Office of Enforcement Counsel may petition to request modification of the order.(2) Upon the request, the court may modify the order at any time and in any manner it deems necessary and appropriate.(3) The agency named in the original petition shall be given notice and an opportunity to be heard.(f) Use of information or materials.--An individual who, by any means authorized by this section, has obtained knowledge of information or materials solely under this section may use the information or materials in a manner consistent with any direction imposed by the court and appropriate to the proper performance of the individual's duties under this part.(g) Violation.--In addition to the remedies and penalties provided in this part, a violation of the provisions of this section may be punished as contempt of court.(h) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "agency" shall mean a "Commonwealth agency" or a "local agency" as those terms are defined in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.§ 59 08. Detention. (a) General rule.--A peace officer who has probable cause to believe that criminal violation of this part has occurred or is occurring on or about an establishment licensee's premises and who has probable cause to believe that a specific individual has committed or is committing the criminal violation may detain the individual in a reasonable manner for a reasonable time on the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 premises of the establishment licensee to require the suspect to identify himself, to verify the identification or to inform a peace officer.(b) Immunity.--A peace officer shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability for detention of an individual in accordance with subsection (a).CHAPTER 61REVENUESSec.6101. Fees.6102. Regulatory assessments.6103. Local gaming terminal tax.6104. Local Gaming Fund.§ 6101. Fees.(a) Application fees.--Subject to section 5511 (relating to alternative local gaming terminal operator licensing standards), the following nonrefundable application fees shall accompany an application for the following licenses or permits applied for under Chapter 55 (relating to application and licensure):(1) For a manufacturer or supplier license, $50,000.(2) For a terminal operator license, $25,000.(3) For an establishment license, $1,000.(4) For a key employee, procurement agent or principal, $500.(5) For any other authorization or permit authorized by this part, an amount established by the board, through regulation, which may not exceed $100.(b) Initial license and renewal fees.--The following nonrefundable fees shall be required upon issuance of an initial license and shall accompany an application for renewal for the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following licenses or permits under Chapter 55:(1) For a manufacturer or supplier license, $10,000.(2) For a terminal operator license, $5,000.(3) For an establishment license, an amount equal to $250 per each local gaming terminal in operation at the premises of the establishment licensee.(4) For a key employee, procurement agent license or principal license, $500.(5) For any other authorization or license authorized by this part, an amount established by the board, through regulation, which may not exceed $100.(c) Terminal increase fee.--An establishment licensee that increases the total number of local gaming terminals within the establishment after submission of the renewal fee required in subsection (b) shall provide the board with a $50 renewal fee for each additional local gaming terminal added to the establishment within 60 days of installation of each additional local gaming terminal.(d) Deposit of fees.--Fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the fund.§ 6102. Regulatory assessments.(a) Accounts established.--The State Treasurer shall establish within the State Treasury an account for each terminal operator for the deposit of a regulatory assessment required under subsection (b) to recover costs or expenses incurred by the board, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police and the Office of Attorney General in carrying out their powers and duties under this part based upon a budget submitted by the department under subsection (c). Establishment licensee and terminal operator licensee shall equally split the regulatory 20250HB1141PN1260 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assessment. Terminal operator licensee will be solely responsible for collection of the equal split amount due from the establishment licensee.(b) Bimonthly deposits.--(1) The department shall determine the appropriate assessment amount for each terminal operator licensee, which shall be a percentage assessed on the terminal operator licensee's bimonthly gross terminal revenue.(2) The percentage assessed shall not exceed an amount equal to the costs or expenses incurred by the board, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Office of Attorney General in carrying out their powers and duties under this part based upon a budget submitted by the department under subsection (c).(c) Itemized budget reporting.--(1) The department shall prepare and annually submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives an itemized budget consisting of amounts to be appropriated out of the accounts established under this section necessary to administer this part.(2) As soon as practicable after submitting copies of the itemized budget, the department shall submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives analyses of and recommendations regarding the itemized budget.(3) The itemized budget required under paragraph (1) 20250HB1141PN1260 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be submitted in conjunction with the budget required to be submitted under section 1202(b)(28) (relating to general and specific powers).(d) Appropriation.--(1) Costs and expenses may be paid from the accounts established under subsection (a) only upon appropriation by the General Assembly.(2) If the total costs or expenses incurred by the board, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Office of Attorney General exceed the amounts available in the accounts established under subsection (a), the General Assembly may appropriate additional amounts to the board, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Office of Attorney General from the fund.§ 6103. Local gaming terminal tax.The department shall determine, and each terminal operator licensee shall pay on a bimonthly basis, a tax of 49% of its gross terminal revenue from all local gaming terminals operated by the terminal operator licensee within this Commonwealth. Terminal operator licensee shall receive 33% of the licensee's gross terminal revenue less the regulatory assessment as outlined in section 6102 (relating to regulatory assessments).§ 6104. Local Gaming Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Local Gaming Fund is established in the State Treasury. The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis as provided in this section.(b) Deposits.--The following shall be deposited into the fund:(1) Licensing fees collected under section 6101 (relating to fees).20250HB1141PN1260 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Regulatory and enforcement assessments collected under section 6102 (relating to regulatory assessments).(3) The local gaming terminal tax collected under section 6103 (relating to local gaming terminal tax).(c) Use and distribution.--Beginning in the first fiscal year after enactment of this section, and each fiscal year thereafter, the money in the fund shall be used and distributed as follows:(1) Two and a half percent to the local municipalities and local counties hosting local gaming terminals.(2) One and a half percent to the restricted receipts account established in the Commonwealth Financing Authority under section 4103(a) (relating to distribution of local share) to be used exclusively for grants for projects in the public interest of the Commonwealth.(3) One percent to the Race Horse Development Trust Fund.(4) Any remaining funds shall be deposited into the General Fund.CHAPTER 63ETHICSSec.6301. Board code of conduct.6302. Additional board restrictions.6303. Financial and employment interests.6304. Additional restrictions.§ 6301. Board code of conduct.(a) Update required.--The board shall update the comprehensive code of conduct established under section 1202.1 (relating to code of conduct) prior to the consideration of a 20250HB1141PN1260 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license, permit or other authorization under this part in order to avoid a perceived or actual conflict of interest and to promote public confidence in the integrity and impartiality of the board as related to local gaming. At a minimum, the updated code of conduct adopted under this section shall include registration of licensed entity representatives under subsection (b) and the restrictions under subsection (c) as they relate to local gaming.(b) Registration.--(1) A licensed entity representative shall register with the board in a manner prescribed by the board. The registration shall include the name, employer or firm, business address and business telephone number of both the licensed entity representative and any licensed entity, applicant for licensure or other person being represented.(2) A licensed entity representative shall update the registration information on an ongoing basis and failure to do so shall be punishable by the board.(3) The board shall maintain a registration list that contains the information required under paragraph (1). The list shall be available on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Restrictions.--In addition to the other prohibitions contained in this part, a member of the board shall:(1) Not accept a discount, gift, gratuity, compensation, travel, lodging or other thing of value, directly or indirectly, from an applicant, licensed entity, affiliate, subsidiary or intermediary of an applicant or a licensed entity, registrant or licensed entity representative.(2) Disclose and recuse himself from a hearing or other 20250HB1141PN1260 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proceeding in which the member's objectivity, impartiality, integrity or independence of judgment may be reasonably questioned due to the member's relationship or association with a party connected to a hearing or proceeding or a person appearing before the board.(3) Refrain from financial or business dealings that would tend to reflect adversely on the member's objectivity, impartiality or independence of judgment.(4) (i) Not solicit funds for a charitable, educational, religious, health, fraternal, civic or other nonprofit entity from an applicant, licensed entity, party, registrant or licensed entity representative or from an affiliate, subsidiary, intermediary or holding company of an applicant, licensed entity, party or licensed entity representative.(ii) Subject to the provisions of section 1201(h)(4.1) (relating to Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board established), a member may serve as an officer, employee or member of the governing body of a nonprofit entity and may attend, make personal contributions to and plan or preside over the entity's fundraising events.(iii) A member may permit the member's name to appear on the letterhead used for fundraising events if the letterhead contains only the member's name and position with the nonprofit entity.(5) (i) Not meet or engage in discussions with an applicant, licensed entity, registrant, licensed entity representative, person who provides goods, property or services to a terminal operator licensee or another person or entity under the jurisdiction of the board 20250HB1141PN1260 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unless the meeting or discussion occurs on the business premises of the board and is recorded in a log.(ii) The log shall be posted on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(iii) The log shall include the date and time of the meeting or discussion, the names of the participants and the subject discussed.(iv) This paragraph shall not apply to a meeting that considers matters requiring the physical inspection of the equipment or premises of an applicant or a licensed entity, if the meeting is entered in the log.(6) Avoid impropriety and the appearance of impropriety at all times and observe standards and conduct that promote public confidence in the oversight of local gaming.(7) Comply with other laws, rules or regulations relating to the conduct of a member.§ 6302. Additional board restrictions.(a) Board restrictions.--The following shall apply to a board member or employee of the board whose duties substantially involve licensing, enforcement, development of law, promulgation of regulations or development of policy relating to gaming under this part or who has other discretionary authority which may affect or influence the outcome of an action, proceeding or decision under this part:(1) The individual may not, for a period of two years following termination of employment, accept employment with or be retained by an applicant or a licensed entity or by an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or a licensed entity.(2) The individual may not, for a period of two years 20250HB1141PN1260 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following termination of employment, appear before the board in a hearing or proceeding or participate in activity on behalf of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity or on behalf of an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity.(3) (i) An applicant or a licensed entity or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or a licensed entity may not, until the expiration of two years following termination of employment, employ or retain the individual.(ii) Violation of this paragraph shall result in termination of the individual's employment and subject the violator to section 5905(c) (relating to prohibited acts and penalties).(4) (i) A prospective employee who, upon employment, would be subject to this subsection must, as a condition of employment, sign an affidavit that the prospective employee will not violate paragraph (1) or (2).(ii) If the prospective employee fails to sign the affidavit, the board shall rescind an offer of employment and may not employ the individual.(b) Contractor restrictions.--The following shall apply to an independent contractor of the board and to an employee of an independent contractor whose duties substantially involve consultation relating to licensing, enforcement, development of law, promulgation of regulations or development of policy relating to local gaming under this part:(1) The person may not, for a period of one year following termination of the contract with the board, be retained by an applicant or a licensed entity or by an 20250HB1141PN1260 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or a licensed entity.(2) The person may not, for a period of two years following termination of the contract with the board, appear before the board in a hearing or proceeding or participate in activity on behalf of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity or on behalf of an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity.(3) (i) An applicant or a licensed entity or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or a licensed entity may not, until the expiration of one year following termination of the contract with the board, employ or retain the person.(ii) A knowing violation of this subparagraph shall result in termination of the individual's employment and subject the violator to section 5905(c).(4) (i) A contract between the board and an independent contractor that involves the duties specified in this subsection shall contain a provision requiring the independent contractor to sign an affidavit that the independent contractor will not violate paragraph (1) or (2).(ii) If the independent contractor fails to sign the affidavit, the board may not enter into the contract or must terminate the contract.(5) (i) An independent contractor shall require a prospective employee whose employment would involve the duties specified in this subsection to sign an affidavit that the prospective employee will not violate paragraph 20250HB1141PN1260 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) or (2).(ii) If the prospective employee fails to sign the affidavit, the independent contractor shall rescind an offer of employment and may not employ the individual.(c) Construction.--Nothing under subsection (a) or (b) shall be construed to prevent a current or former employee of the board, a current or former independent contractor or a current or former employee of an independent contractor, from appearing before the board in a hearing or proceeding as a witness or testifying as to any fact or information.(d) State Ethics Commission.--(1) The State Ethics Commission shall issue a written determination of whether a person is subject to subsection (a) or (b) upon the written request of the person or the person's employer or potential employer. A person that relies in good faith on a determination issued under this paragraph shall not be subject to a penalty for an action taken, provided that all material facts specified in the request for the determination are correct.(2) (i) The State Ethics Commission shall publish a list of all employment positions within the board and employment positions within independent contractors whose duties would subject the individuals in those positions to the provisions of subsections (a) and (b).(ii) The board and each independent contractor shall assist the State Ethics Commission in the development of the list, which shall be published by the State Ethics Commission in the Pennsylvania Bulletin biennially and posted by the board on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.20250HB1141PN1260 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Upon request, employees of the board and each independent contractor shall provide the State Ethics Commission with adequate information to accurately develop and maintain the list.(iv) The State Ethics Commission may impose a civil penalty under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1109(f) (relating to penalties) upon an individual who fails to cooperate with the State Ethics Commission under this paragraph.(v) An individual who relies in good faith on the list published by the State Ethics Commission shall not be subject to a penalty for a violation of subsection (a) or (b).§ 6303. Financial and employment interests.(a) Financial interests.--Except as may be provided for the judiciary by rule or order of the Pennsylvania Supreme Court, an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, shall not intentionally or knowingly hold a financial interest in an applicant or a licensee, or in a holding company, affiliate, intermediary or subsidiary thereof, while the individual is an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer and for one year following termination of the individual's status as an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer.(b) Employment.--Except as may be provided by rule or order of the Pennsylvania Supreme Court and except as provided in section 1202.1 (relating to code of conduct) or 4304 (relating to additional restrictions), no executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, shall be employed by an applicant or licensee, or by a 20250HB1141PN1260 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 holding company, affiliate, intermediary or subsidiary thereof, while the individual is an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer and for one year following termination of the individual's status as an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer.(c) Complimentary services.--(1) No executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, shall solicit or accept a complimentary service from an applicant or licensee, or from an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof, which the executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, knows or has reason to know is other than a service or discount which is offered to members of the general public in like circumstances.(2) No applicant or licensee, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof, shall offer or deliver to an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, a complimentary service from the applicant or licensee, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof, that the applicant or licensee, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof, knows or has reason to know is other than a service or discount that is offered to members of the general public in like circumstances.(d) Grading.--An individual who violates this section commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,000 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.20250HB1141PN1260 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Divestiture.--(1) An executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, who holds a financial interest prohibited by this section shall divest the financial interest within three months of the effective date of this paragraph, as applicable.(2) An executive-level public employee, public official, party officer or immediate family member shall have 30 days from the date the individual knew or had reason to know of the violation or 30 days from publication on the board's publicly accessible Internet website under section 5301(b)(12) (relating to powers of board) of the application or licensure of the executive-level public employee, public official, party officer or immediate family member, whichever occurs earlier, to divest the financial interest.(3) The State Ethics Commission may, for good cause, extend the time period under this subsection.(f) State Ethics Commission.--The State Ethics Commission shall do all of the following:(1) (i) Issue a written determination of whether a person is subject to subsection (a), (b) or (c) upon the written request of the person or another person that may have liability for an action taken with respect to the person.(ii) A person that relies in good faith on a determination made under this paragraph shall not be subject to penalty for an action taken, provided that all material facts specified in the request for the determination are correct.(2) (i) Publish a list of all State, county, municipal 20250HB1141PN1260 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and other government positions that meet the definitions of "public official" as defined under subsection (g) or "executive-level public employee" as defined under section 5103 (relating to definitions).(ii) The Office of Administration shall assist the State Ethics Commission in the development of the list, which list shall be published by the State Ethics Commission in the Pennsylvania Bulletin biennially and posted by the board on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(iii) Upon request, a public official shall provide the State Ethics Commission with adequate information to accurately develop and maintain the list.(iv) The State Ethics Commission may impose a civil penalty under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1109(f) (relating to penalties) upon an individual, including a public official or executive-level public employee, who fails to cooperate with the State Ethics Commission under this subsection.(v) A person that relies in good faith on the list published by the State Ethics Commission shall not be subject to penalty for a violation of this section.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A person that applies for a manufacturer license, supplier license or terminal operator license under this part."Financial interest." Owning or holding, or being deemed to hold, debt or equity securities or other ownership interest or 20250HB1141PN1260 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 profits interest. A financial interest shall not include a debt or equity security, or other ownership interest or profits interest, which is held or deemed to be held in any of the following:(1) A blind trust over which the executive-level public employee, public official, party officer or immediate family member thereof may not exercise any managerial control or receive income during the tenure of office and the period under subsection (a). The provisions of this paragraph shall apply only to blind trusts established prior to the effective date of this paragraph.(2) Securities that are held in a pension plan, profit-sharing plan, individual retirement account, tax-sheltered annuity, a plan established in accordance with 26 U.S.C. § 457 (relating to deferred compensation plans of state and local governments and tax-exempt organizations) or a successor provision deferred compensation plan whether qualified or not qualified under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor provision or other retirement plan that:(i) is not self-directed by the individual; and(ii) is advised by an independent investment adviser who has sole authority to make investment decisions with respect to contributions made by the individual to these plans.(3) A tuition account plan organized and operated under 26 U.S.C. § 529 (relating to qualified tuition programs) that is not self-directed by the individual.(4) A mutual fund where the interest owned by the mutual fund in a licensed entity does not constitute a controlling 20250HB1141PN1260 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interest as defined in this part."Immediate family." A spouse, minor child or unemancipated child."Licensee." A manufacturer licensee, supplier licensee or a terminal operator licensee."Party officer." A member of a national committee, a chairperson, vice chairperson, secretary, treasurer or counsel of a State committee or member of the executive committee of a State committee, a county chairperson, vice chairperson, counsel, secretary or treasurer of a county committee in which a licensed facility is located or a city chairperson, vice chairperson, counsel, secretary or treasurer of a city committee of a city in which a licensed facility is located."Public official." The term shall include the following:(1) The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, a member of the Governor's cabinet, State Treasurer, Auditor General and Attorney General of the Commonwealth.(2) A member of the Senate or the House of Representatives of the Commonwealth.(3) An individual elected or appointed to an office of a county or municipality that directly receives a distribution of revenue under this part.(4) An individual elected or appointed to a department, agency, board, commission, authority or other governmental body not included in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) that directly receives a distribution of revenue under this part.(5) An individual elected or appointed to a department, agency, board, commission, authority, county, municipality or other governmental body not included in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) with discretionary power that may influence or affect the 20250HB1141PN1260 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 outcome of an action or decision and who is involved in the development of regulation or policy relating to a licensed entity or is involved in other matters under this part.§ 6304. Additional restrictions.(a) Restrictions.--(1) No individual trooper or employee of the Pennsylvania State Police or employee of the Office of Attorney General or the department, whose duties substantially involve licensing or enforcement, the development of laws or the development or adoption of regulations or policy related to gaming under this part, or who has other discretionary authority that may affect or influence the outcome of an action, proceeding or decision under this part may do any of the following:(i) Accept employment with or be retained by an applicant or licensed entity, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or licensed entity, for a period of two years after the termination of employment.(ii) (A) Appear before the board in a hearing or proceeding or participate in other activity on behalf of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity, for a period of two years after termination of employment.(B) Nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed to prevent a current or former trooper or employee of the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General or the department from appearing 20250HB1141PN1260 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 before the board in a proceeding or hearing as a witness or testifying as to a fact or information.(2) As a condition of employment, a potential employee who would be subject to this subsection shall sign an affidavit that the individual will not accept employment with or be retained by an applicant or licensed entity, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or licensed entity, for a period of two years after the termination of employment.(b) Employment or retention.--(1) No applicant or licensed entity or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or licensed entity may employ or retain an individual subject to subsection (a) until the expiration of the period required in subsection (a)(1)(i).(2) An applicant or licensed entity, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or licensed entity, that knowingly employs or retains an individual in violation of this subsection, shall terminate the employment of the individual and be subject to penalty under section 1518(c) (relating to prohibited acts; penalties).(c) Violation.--If an individual subject to subsection (a) refuses or otherwise fails to sign an affidavit, the individual's potential employer shall rescind the offer of employment.(d) Code of conduct.--(1) The Pennsylvania State Police, Office of Attorney General and department each shall adopt a comprehensive code of conduct that supplements all other requirements under this 20250HB1141PN1260 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 part and 65 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to accountability), as applicable, and shall provide guidelines applicable to troopers, employees, independent contractors of the agency whose duties substantially involve licensing or enforcement, the development of laws or the development or adoption of regulations or policy related to local gaming under this part or who have other discretionary authority that may affect the outcome of an action, proceeding or decision under this part, and the immediate families of these individuals to enable them to avoid a perceived or actual conflict of interest and to promote public confidence in the integrity and impartiality of local gaming enforcement and regulation.(2) At a minimum, the code of conduct adopted under this section shall apply the types of restrictions applicable to members under section 1202.1(c) (relating to code of conduct), except that the restrictions under section 1202.1(c)(5) shall not apply to an elected Attorney General.(e) State Ethics Commission.--The State Ethics Commission shall do all of the following:(1) (i) Issue a written determination of whether an individual is subject to subsection (a) upon the written request of the individual or the individual's employer or potential employer.(ii) A person that relies in good faith on a determination made under this paragraph shall not be subject to penalty for an action taken, provided that all material facts specified in the request for the determination are correct.(2) (i) Publish a list of all positions within the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General 20250HB1141PN1260 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the department the duties of which would subject the individuals in those positions to the provisions of subsection (a).(ii) Each agency subject to this subsection shall assist the State Ethics Commission in the development of the list, which list shall be published by the State Ethics Commission in the Pennsylvania Bulletin biennially, shall be posted by the board on the board's publicly accessible Internet website and shall be posted by each agency on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website.(iii) Upon request by the State Ethics Commission, members and employees of each agency subject to this subsection shall provide the State Ethics Commission with adequate information to accurately develop and maintain the list.(iv) The State Ethics Commission may impose a civil penalty under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1109(f) (relating to penalties) upon an individual who fails to cooperate with the State Ethics Commission under this subsection.(v) A person who relies in good faith on the list published by the State Ethics Commission shall not be subject to penalty for a violation of subsection (a).CHAPTER 65MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.6501. Funding.6502. Declaration of exemption from Federal laws prohibiting local gaming terminals.6503. Preemption of local taxes and license fees.20250HB1141PN1260 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 6504. Exclusive jurisdiction of Supreme Court.§ 6501. Funding.(a) Appropriation.--The General Assembly appropriates the following:(1) The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the board for the fiscal period July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026, to implement and administer the provisions of this part.(2) The sum of $3,000,000 is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for the fiscal period July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026, to prepare for, implement and administer the provisions of this part.(3) The sum of $2,000,000 is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Pennsylvania State Police for the fiscal period July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026, to prepare for, implement and administer the provisions of this part.(b) Repayment required.--The money appropriated under this section shall be repaid to the General Fund by establishment licensees according to subsection (c).(c) Repayment schedule.--Beginning two years from the date the board authorizes the first local gaming terminal to be connected to the central control computer system and is made available for public use, the department shall collect an assessment of .05% of gross terminal revenue on a bimonthly basis from each terminal operator licensee for deposit into the General Fund, provided the assessment does not cause total assessments to exceed the 1% gross terminal revenue threshold outlined in section 6102 (relating to regulatory assessments). The department shall continue to collect the assessment until the amounts under subsection (a) are repaid to the General Fund.20250HB1141PN1260 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Unused amounts.--On July 1, 2026, any portion of amounts appropriated under this section that are unexpended, unencumbered or uncommitted as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year shall automatically be transferred to the General Fund.§ 6502. Declaration of exemption from Federal laws prohibiting local gaming terminals.(a) Declaration.--Under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 24 (relating to transportation of gambling devices), the Commonwealth declares that it is exempt from section 2 of that act.(b) Legal shipments.--All shipments of gambling devices, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1171 (relating to definitions), into this Commonwealth, the registering, recording and labeling of which has been effected by the manufacturer and supplier of those devices in accordance with 15 U.S.C. §§ 1173 (relating to registration of manufacturers and dealers) and 1174 (relating to labeling and marking of shipping packages), shall be deemed legal shipments of gambling devices into this Commonwealth.§ 6503. Preemption of local taxes and license fees.(a) Statutes.--Local gaming terminals shall be exempt from taxes levied under the following:(1) The act of August 5, 1932 (Sp.Sess., P.L.45, No.45), referred to as the Sterling Act.(2) The act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act.(3) 53 Pa.C.S. Pt. III Subpt. E (relating to home rule and optional plan government).(4) Any statute that confers taxing authority to a political subdivision.(b) Licensing fees.--Local gaming terminals are exempt from local licensing fees.20250HB1141PN1260 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 6504. Exclusive jurisdiction of Supreme Court.The Pennsylvania Supreme Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear a challenge to or to render a declaratory judgment concerning the constitutionality of this part. The Pennsylvania Supreme Court may take such action as it deems appropriate, consistent with the Pennsylvania Supreme Court retaining jurisdiction over the matter, to find facts or to expedite a final judgment in connection with a challenge or request for declaratory relief.Section 3. Section 5513(a) introductory paragraph and (1) and (e.1) of Title 18 are amended and subsection (f) is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 5513. Gambling devices, gambling, etc.(a) Offense defined.--A person is guilty of a [misdemeanor] felony of the [first] third degree if [he] that person:(1) intentionally or knowingly makes, assembles, sets up, maintains, sells, lends, leases, gives away, or offers for sale, loan, lease or gift, any [punch board, drawing card, slot machine or any] illegal gambling device [to be used for gambling purposes, except playing cards];* * *[(e.1) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any activity that is lawfully conducted under any of the following:(1) The act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law.(2) The act of July 10, 1981 (P.L.214, No.67), known as the Bingo Law.(3) The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act.20250HB1141PN1260 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements).](f) Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Illegal gambling device." A mechanical, computerized or electrical contrivance, game, terminal, machine or device which, upon insertion or payment of cash or cash equivalent as a wager, is available to play or operate one or more games, the play or outcome of which is determined by any element of either chance or skill, and may deliver or entitle the player to receive cash or cash equivalent or any instrument or representation of value that is more than nominal. The term shall not include any activity that is lawfully conducted under any of the following:(1) The act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law.(2) The act of July 10, 1981 (P.L.214, No.67), known as the Bingo Law.(3) The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act.(4) 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements).* * *Section 4. Title 35 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7322. Pennsylvania Emergency Management Programs Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Emergency Management Programs Fund is established in the State Treasury. The money in the fund is appropriated upon approval of the Governor to the agency for the uses specified in subsection (c).(b) Funding sources.--The fund shall consist of money transferred from the Local Gaming Fund established in 4 Pa.C.S. 20250HB1141PN1260 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 6104 (relating to Local Gaming Fund), interest earned on the money and other money made available to the agency for deposit into the fund.(c) Use.--The money in the fund shall be used for grants awarded under the following:(1) A grant program, established by statute enacted after the effective date of this paragraph, for urban search and rescue teams.(2) Section 7811 (relating to establishment).(3) Section 7821 (relating to establishment).Section 5. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The addition of 4 Pa.C.S. §§ 5101, 5103, 5301 and 5501.This section.(2) The addition of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7322 shall take effect June 30, 2025.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1141PN1260 - 139 - 12345678910111213141516171819